The goods cost less than 20 euros.
The fee is 40% of the value of the goods....
I am a #PRS_ORG# customer and therefore it is no problem for me.
I just need a number or instruction as to where I should drop the package so that it can be returned to you.
I ordered #PRS_ORG# a few days ago... for 249€.
Today, it costs 179€.
I find that quite annoying.
Should I cancel the order and place a new one for the better price or is there another way to get a refund?
I generally think that children shouldn't be expected to take on the parental role for their younger siblings.
However, I think it is good for big brothers and sisters to take care of the little ones in moderation.
Look quickly, help quickly, bring the bottle etc.
This way they learn responsibility, help in the family and are involved.
As long as they can still have enough children, I don't see a problem.
If your K1 is occupied for a short time and it's okay for him, that's good.
You can judge for yourself whether this is suitable for your children.
It is not the case that he should wrap K2 and accompany him for hours while sleeping.
It is probably legally questionable.
Perhaps this is why the psychologist's statement comes across.
Because if something actually did happen like a fire, break-in, earthquake, alien invasion, etc. it would actually be too much responsibility for K1 to take care of K2.
Whether this is a risk you want to take is of course up to you ;)
Please help me find the title of a book!
I remember reading a crime/thriller a few years ago and I can still remember almost the entire plot, but the title will not come to me. Perhaps someone here knows the answer...
The story was about fear and how to overcome it.
At the beginning of the story, a zookeeper commits suicide by showering himself with food and going into the enclosure with his raptors.
The case is taken over by a detective who, after a short investigation, finds his therapist who runs a clinic where he treats anxiety patients.
The commissioner has a small niece who is also afraid of fire and ends up with this therapist.
More suicides are happening and there is another protagonist - a photographer who is hired to go to the scene of the suicide and document it and post the photos online.
In the end, it turns out that this therapist is running an underground therapy group where a chip is implanted in the patient's brain that suppresses the fear center and the patients ultimately end up facing their fears in the most extreme way possible.
(A woman jumps out of a window, another drives herself to death on purpose)
This is what the book refers to as "the fight."
At the end, there is a big showdown in the hospital, which had been on fire.
That's the gist of the plot, I'm pretty sure the book was written by a French author/author.
If someone knows this action or even tells me the title of the book, I would be very happy.
Oh, I don't have the Wi-Fi password.
I have to contact my husband first.
That can take a while.
What steps should I take afterwards?
Is it also possible to get the price difference refunded?
Child, 4 years, splinter under the nail
The child, four years old, has splinters under his fingernail (outside) over the entire length of the splinter.
They tried to pull him out with a pin.
Very hard to reach.
It didn't work and hurt.
Now the child is hysterically reacting when we try to do anything.
No chance anymore.
Tomorrow I go to the doctor.
All Bosch electric, pneumatic and measuring tools are carefully tested, inspected and subject to the stringent quality control of Bosch quality assurance.
Therefore, Bosch guarantees its Bosch electric tools, air tools and measuring tools.
The buyer's claims for defects arising from the contract of sale with the seller, as well as legal rights, are not affected by this guarantee.
For these tools, we guarantee according to the following conditions:
We guarantee according to the following regulations (Nos. 2 - 7) by free repair of defects in the tool attributable to a material or manufacturing error within the warranty period.
The warranty period is 24 months for commercial or professional use or equivalent use.
The guarantee period begins with the purchase by the first end-user.
The date on the original receipt is the determining factor.
For all commercial blue electric and measuring tools (excluding high-frequency tools, industrial battery clamps and air tools) purchased from 01.09.2004, the warranty period is extended to 36 months if the purchaser registers the tools within 4 weeks of purchase.
Battery packs and chargers, as well as accessories supplied with the device, are excluded from this extended warranty.
Registration can only be done online at www.bosch-pt.com/warranty.
The registration receipt must be printed immediately, and the original purchase receipt will reveal the date of purchase.
Registration is only possible if the buyer agrees to the storage of their data.
Excluded from the guarantee are: parts subject to wear and tear due to normal use, as well as defects in the tool caused by normal use, abnormal environmental conditions, foreign operating conditions, overloading, or lack of maintenance or care.
Defects in the tool caused by the use of non-Bosch original parts, accessories, or replacement parts.
Tools used to make changes or additions.
Minor deviations from the desired shape, which are insignificant in terms of value and usability of the tool.
We will remedy the defect by repairing or replacing the defective tool at our discretion, either free of charge or with a new, defect-free tool (if available).
Replacement tools or parts transfer to our ownership.
When did the deadline expire?
According to the Distance Selling Act, I have the right to withdraw within one month.
The LokSound 5 is the most important member of the LokSound family.
By combining the digital decoder and sound module on a printed circuit board, we achieve dimensions of only 30mm x 15.5mm and can therefore be installed in nearly every H0 and 0 gauge locomotive.
LokSound 5 decoders are offered with all common interfaces and always come with a 11x15mm "sugar cube" speaker with a sound chamber kit.
Like all family members, the LokSound5 is a true multi-protocol decoder.
He is familiar with the data format DCC as well as Motorola®, Selectrix® and M4.
In the DCC format, 14 to 128 steps are as natural as two- and four-digit addresses and up to 32 functions.
Thanks to RailComPlus® the decoders report themselves to a suitable digital central station automatically.
He knows all DCC programming modes and thanks to RailCom® can read the CV values on the main track.
For those who can only program CVs from 1-255, there are help registers.
Motorola® users benefit from up to 28 steps at 255 addresses.
Three additional Motorola® addresses allow the activation of 16 functions.
A built-in programming mode makes it possible to reprogram the venerable Control Unit 6021.
The M4 protocol allows for automatic registration to mfx®-compatible central stations.
The LokSound 5 decoder recognizes Märklin® brake tracks as well as ZIMO® HLU brake commands or the Lenz® ABC system.
It is also possible to brake with DCC brake blocks or with DC voltage.
In addition, he also holds a Selectrix® brake diode.
An ABC pendulum train automation system allows automatic switching between two stations.
The LokSound 5 decoder can be used on both analog and digital tracks.
After my voucher was not extended due to a complaint that I did not receive, I will place my order worth about.
#NUMBER#€ removed from my shopping cart and ordered elsewhere where the customer service is higher and I don't have to put my fingers at risk to get nothing!!
What am I supposed to do with this number?
Because of Omikron: Johnson wants to push for booster vaccinations
Politics and science in Britain are constantly dealing with new Omikron cases.
By New Year's Day, all eligible adults in England should receive an offer to be vaccinated.
London - British Prime Minister Boris Johnson wants to catch up with the rapid rise in Omikron figures even faster than previously planned.
Every adult in England will be offered a booster dose by the end of the year, if at least three months have passed since their second jab, Johnson said in a prerecorded video message to his countrymen on Sunday.
So far, the deadline has been set for the end of January.
The British government will also provide additional support to accelerate the vaccination campaigns in Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland.
In the face of the Omikron variant, we are facing a crisis, which is why the vaccine protection must be strengthened urgently, said Johnson.
The good news is that the protection level can be increased with a third vaccine dose.
"Let's boo!" Johnson said.
On Sunday, 1239 more cases of the Omicron variant were registered in the UK, taking the total to 3137.
Compared to the previous day, it was an increase of about 65 percent. dpa
Will the full amount be refunded from the purchase price when collected?
I am for everyone to imagine pronouns
I sent in my application.
Today, the invitation to a conversation was sent by email.
I want to reply to the email.
However, unfortunately, the name is not "Peter," but a somewhat more complicated name.
I've googled him/her and depending on his/her cultural background, it's either a man or a woman.
**I have no idea how to write an email now.
Can someone help me?
** I am a foreigner and I will not step over anyone's feet.
Conclusion: Everyone should imagine pronouns.
I have a total of 5 books.
Four of them are going.
Only one of the things I bought today works
Apparently, the chair had a hidden defect in its sale.
How can such a mattress damage occur after 9 months otherwise?
First on the #PRS_ORG#.
But it has been working for some time now.
No more than 14 days.
That's why I always buy the last books on the website and then read them on the #PRS_ORG#.
I bought 6 #PRS_ORG# but wanted to buy 8.
However, there was none left.
Now they are back in stock and I would like to add two chairs to my order and have the total charged to me.
[CW] The feeling when I can't help.
Content warning: I will be writing here about domestic violence in some detail.
I just need to write something from my soul.
I (21) come into contact with victims (and perpetrators) of domestic violence more often due to my profession.
A theme that is really getting to me and unfortunately happens too often is that many victims do not seek help or think we can't help them.
I am aware that we cannot do everything and it is not perfect.
But there are fewer things in my job that move me more than when I can't do anything in such situations.
I see the blue spots, the blood, the desperate eyes...
But even in conversation with the perpetrator, who is far out of sight and hearing, I cannot reach all of them.
I don't know what the reason is, maybe it's fear, fear of revenge, fear of leaving the familiar social environment, fear of taking the children away from this.
What I always want to make clear, sometimes very close to tears, is that everyone is worth living without violence.
I want all women to know that they do not have to simply accept violence.
I often wish I could help in any way... I know I can't.
But it will never get easier.
Please, always keep in mind that you are worth living without violence, which is so incredibly important.
"Arcane" on Netflix: What does the series have to do with "League of Legends"?
There's a lot of fantasy, a lot of complicated names, and an amazing presentation: Arcane, the series from the League of Legends video game universe, has recently started on Netflix.
Why are we excited about the already announced two seasons?
Basketball Bundesliga: Derby-Debakel der MHP Riesen Ludwigsburg bei den Merlins Crailsheim
At least young Johannes Patrick was left behind.
Nothing again: For the second time in less than three months, the giants lost in Crailsheim - and how!
Before the game, Ludwigsburg coach John Patrick said after the cup defeat in October: "We still have some anger in our stomachs."
However, after the game, she did not lay down - but rather increased her efforts, given the 61:72 (28:38) defeat in the Basketball Bundesliga.
Where more than the bare result disappointed.
In a nutshell, a statistic is cited that sums up the whole dilemma: The three-point rate was just 13 percent, with four goals (all of which were scored by young Johannes Patrick) in just 31 attempts - any questions?
John Patrick's response was: "We were not focused enough after the victory in Tenerife and did not implement what we had trained."
That is, to move the ball.
His opponent Sebastian Gleim reacted differently: "It was a great game to win against Ludwigsburg for the second time," said the happy coach.
"It felt like 10,000 people."
Only 750 people were allowed into the Hohenlohe Arena on Saturday, but they paid for it.
Not least because of BBL top scorer T.J. Shorts, who marked 22 points and steered his team's game.
"The best player I've ever trained," Gleim praised.
While Patrick's team saw its top performers like Jordan Hulls (0 points) and Jonah Radebaugh (7) fail across the board.
Only in the last quarter (22:15) did the giants prevent a total disaster and came within eight points of the lead after they had already been 39:59 behind.
In addition to Johannes Patrick, Justin Simon scored twelve points.
Unfortunately, there is not much time to waste.
Already on Wednesday (7:19 p.m.) the Giants receive the Skyliners Frankfurt, before then also in Ludwigsburg at most 750 spectators.
We used to have a different email address, but I changed it.
Yes, I have already reported this several months ago.
Unfortunately, all warranty claims were rejected.
We have checked our legal position again and have therefore written to them again.
We had already reported this half a year ago.
Always like a boiled egg: Max Raabe is 59
He can enthuse his audience with new interpretations of songs from the 1920s and 1930s.
Currently, he is traveling with the program "Guten Tag, liebes Glück" - if he is allowed to appear.
Actually, Max Raabe wanted to celebrate his birthday on stage in Leipzig on this Sunday.
But nothing comes of it.
The planned concert has been moved to May 2022 - "in accordance with government instructions" to contain the coronavirus.
Other performances he had planned for the Advent season have had to be cancelled, as stated on the singer's website (www.palast-orchester.de) and his musicians (www.palast-orchester.de).
From January, the artists will then try to reschedule their already postponed 2020 dates.
Born on December 12, 1962 in Lünen, North Rhine-Westphalia, Max Raabe has sung a lot and enjoyed it as a youth.
In Berlin he studied opera singing, in 1986 he founded together with his fellow students the Palast Orchester.
Since then, the baritone has established himself with his repertoire of schlager and chanson songs in the style of the Comedian Harmonists.
He has been awarded many prizes.
His live album from the "MTV Unplugged" series (2019) reached - just like his successful album "Für Frauen ist das kein Problem" (2013) - the second place in the charts.
He has managed to make it into the mainstream from the niche.
Always elegantly dressed, the blonde hair tightly combed back and mindful of etiquette, Max Raabe is not to be missed from the current German-language music scene.
With the program "Guten Tag, liebe Glück", he has been on tour since 2020. dpa
Hello #NAME#, is it possible to get a small sample of the furniture wood before purchasing?
We can add the existing furniture and so we can check beforehand whether it matches the colour
It still doesn't work, I can only stretch the cover but I can't turn the pages.
Federal Minister of Urban Development Klara Geywitz: Expropriation does not create new housing
The new Federal Minister of Housing, Klara Geywitz (SPD), has spoken out against the expropriation of large apartment complexes, as was demanded in a referendum in Berlin.
"With an expropriation, no new apartments are created, only the ownership structure changes," said Geywitz in an interview with the "Tagesspiegel" (Sunday).
My goal is to give tenants peace of mind that their rent will remain affordable for the next few years.
By the way, a colourful mix of, for example, private landlords, co-operatives or housing associations is the best protection against monopolisation.
In Berlin, the coalition of SPD, Greens and Left Party will set up an expert commission on how to deal with the outcome of the referendum.
However, if the situation does not improve, Geywitz has not ruled out talks with the FDP in the Ampel coalition on further tightening of the rental law.
The coalition agreement provides for a rent cap until 2029, a cap on rent increases in tight housing markets and the expansion of the rent index.
I will be speaking with the justice minister to implement this as quickly as possible.
If the rental market does not improve, "we will talk to our coalition partners about further steps," said the SPD politician.
Hello, I wanted to order something and after a few days I noticed that I had forgotten the last step in the payment.
Unfortunately, the product is no longer available.
Do they know when it will be back in stock?
Or if it will come back again?
#PRS_ORG# with storage (180 x #NUMBER# cm),
The voucher sounds great
Then I will independently open a new order for the new order.
Many thanks for the quick clarification!
If the lamp is sent in March, how long will the delivery take?
I have already cut my finger
That is absolute cheek
At least 100 dead in Kentucky tornadoes
A devastating storm system has swept through the United States, producing numerous tornadoes.
More than 100 deaths could be mourned in Kentucky alone.
The pictures from there reminded me of a war zone.
On Saturday night, several tornadoes caused severe damage in the United States and may have claimed up to 100 lives.
The storms left a 320-mile-long path of destruction, especially in the state of Kentucky.
Its governor, Andy Beshear, said after visiting the disaster area that everything was gone everywhere the tornado had passed.
Houses, shops, government buildings - all gone.
Parts of industrial plants, roofs are in the trees.
It is hard to imagine that this is possible.
He is dealing with as many as 100 deaths alone in the state of Kentucky, with official figures rising by the hour.
Hello, I just saw that the Vitrine #NAME# is sold out.
That's very disappointing.
Is it still being produced?
Or is she completely out of stock?
Is it possible to order this cabinet in another country?
When do you report?
If the delivery cannot be made to my apartment, I must cancel the order!
I understand that, but I can order the ceiling and have it delivered to Germany, which is in the shopping cart?
I had returned the contact form or given up on it and wanted to know if it had been received or processed, as I had not yet received a confirmation.
Firms pay for vaccines and change advertising slogans
While the federal government continues to reject proposals for a vaccine bonus, companies in Austria have taken the initiative and are offering their employees a vaccine bonus.
They are in line with the social partners ÖGB and Chamber of Commerce, who today called for financial incentives for vaccination.
Even the transformation of advertising slogans into vaccination calls - in German style - is supposed to increase the willingness to get vaccinated against COVID-19.
He has moved to a company where he has been fired.
That doesn't make his situation better than yours.
Wait and drink tea.
It's been a year.
He had obviously not re-stitched his old place and was looking for something else.
You can do that too.
And that he didn't like you then: well, that's fine.
He didn't like his job either.
There are too many variables.
Please cancel the reservation.
That will then be relevant in a legal sense.
I'm taking a screenshot.
Guten Tag - ich interessiere mich für den Esstisch von Boone, Weiß.
Is there one in size 230cm?
We offer all Smeg kitchen appliances and the corresponding accessories in our online shop kitchenpoint.de.
We generally check the quality and completeness of your order.
The new Smeg coffee vending machine brings freshly ground coffee to your kitchen or office.
The simple and reduced design, the plastic surface in matt colours combined with the matt-brushed stainless steel front makes the new SMEG coffee machine with milk frother into a design object.
The reduced design allows for all functions such as grind and water volume, as well as the choice between espresso, Americano, ristretto or a mild coffee with just four buttons.
Thanks to the steam nozzle, it is also possible to prepare coffee milk and milk foam specialities.
Help with first own campaign
Boron to the rescue!
I'm currently running a group of 4 friends through the adventure Over the Greifenpass and want to seamlessly transition them into a campaign specifically written for the players.
We are playing DSA 5.
The big arc is made, the villains and their motivations written, the individual acts devised and now I'm writing the introductory adventure and already at my own feet I'm stumbling over my own words.
The premise is that the heroes are to bring a wagon of grain from Gratenfels to a small village near the Thuran Sea.
Here, the further course of action will develop.
Some miles from the village, the heroes will encounter a group of goblins and lure them into a trap.
I want to give the player characters the opportunity to resolve the confrontation in a variety of ways: persuasion, action, intimidation, recognizing the danger early on, whatever the players come up with.
Group size: 8 regular goblins, 2 with spears, 6 with bows and swords armed
The Goblins lurk in the shadows, waiting for the heroes to pass by on the narrow path, and flank the carriage on either side, armed with bows, while two with spears stop the carriage.
If it comes to a fight and the heroes lose, I have two solutions
1. The heroes are all made unconscious and subsequently found and healed by the son of the village schoolmaster, a half-elf.
The cart is of course gone.
2. If a defeat is inevitable, then this half-elf will join forces with two of his servants and come to the aid of the heroes in battle.
The cart is still there, everything is great.
How appropriate is the Deus ex Machina of solution 2?
Is the encounter too much of an adventure to start with?
The group of goblins will later play a crucial role, so they are not just cannon fodder.
EDIT: Wow, I didn't expect so many answers, especially not so many great suggestions and tips.
I will guarantee that many of your ideas will be implemented, and now I also have more confidence in my narratives.
I took the lamp apart again.
And again stuck together.
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work.
So I would like to send them back anyway
Can you then come back with the receipts, then I can pack the lamp and bring it to the #PRS_ORG#.
Shipping costs and time saved - and the environment is spared!
If you need more than one article, please click "Pay now" only when you have all the articles in your shopping cart.
Thus, the combi delivery is automatically calculated and you get everything in one package.
This approach saves you the multiple purchases/payments and the environment is happy as no unnecessary packaging and unnecessary fuel is used for the delivery of multiple packages.
Faster shipping with DHL, DPD and Deutsche Post!
We usually ship your order the same day if payment is received by 14:00.
So that your package arrives as quickly as possible, please make sure that your address is complete and that your name is also on your mailbox and doorbell.
Would you like us to send your package to a post office?
Please choose DHL, because only DHL can deliver to DHL stations.
We will send you an email with the tracking number, if you have chosen DHL or DPD as the shipper.
Therefore, you can already check where your package is from around 22:00.
Your satisfaction is our goal - all five stars count!
If you are satisfied with us, we would be happy if you rate us positively and give us five stars in the details.
If at any time you are not completely satisfied with the outcome, we would be grateful if you would let us know before you leave a review.
That's how we have the chance to do everything we can to make you happy.
We have nothing to do with the chair.
All of a sudden there was a crack
I was just sitting there
Here was the lower part, so to speak, the part with the storage damaged.
Will everything be picked up or just the storage space?
I'm sick of Sky Sports F1
Hello dear F1 fans, throughout the season the quality on German Sky has decreased significantly, so I want to take a little break with this post.
First, the broadcast was interrupted midway through the F2 race to start the F1 pre-race coverage on time.
Although the time plan was far behind the planning due to the delayed start and the accident, it would still have been possible to show the last (planned) ten minutes as well as the championship decision!
Apparently, however, legal reasons mean that F1 has priority and therefore everything else must be restricted, meaning that Sky DE had no choice but to make compromises.
Still dumb, though, given that Sky UK has live-streamed the race.
Nevertheless, a small compliment: the commentator Olivier Zwartyes handled the difficult situation around the serious accident well.
Then there was confusion among the commentators Sascha Roos and Ralf Schumacher, as they did not know that one can change the tyres under a red flag.
Although there have been similar situations in Imola, Baku and Silverstone this year, it wasn't until Hamilton's team radio messages that Verstappen decided to change his tyres.
Both commentators at Sky UK and RTL knew immediately that this was an opportunity for Verstappen.
I think it's important to know such basic rules when you're commentating on a pay-TV F1 channel.
It is also not the first time that a puzzle has been required or allowed, both have simply had persistent uncertainty about the rules.
In general, Roos's comment style is not to my taste, but I concede that it is a matter of taste.
But I actually prefer Heiko Wasser from RTL more seriously.
There are also constant absurdities that both simply look unprofessional, like ordering coffee from (equally clueless) reporter Peter Hardenacke or "UuuuuHD" from Ralf Schumacher.
The latter, however, is causing a lot of trouble in the comments, which he apparently does not take seriously.
Not least, the advertising takes over on Sky, in the final round, Sky is the only channel that goes into advertising, as one can only listen to the German sound track without commentary after the race.
Neither ServusTV nor ORF are doing this.
These two channels also make less advertising than Sky, and as free-to-air channels.
Glock and Baumgartner must be praised for their work, but that alone does not make me overlook the disadvantages.
The rest of Sky Sports F1's programme is also very thin on the ground and full of repeats.
In total, Sky is really the worst German-language broadcaster of the F1.
Unironically, RTL does a better job with the four races they are allowed to broadcast.
In any case, the grandiose F1 season is much less fun than it would be with a decent broadcaster.
I would like to know what you think.
Here: #PRS_ORG#-Pendant light, brass and multicolored glass x 1
Hello, I have an article that was supposed to be delivered last week and it still hasn't been delivered.
I have contacted the chat twice and so far nothing.
The First Lady told me it would be sent out on Monday, the Second Lady told me yesterday that she would check and send it and she never replied.
Hello, I ordered two #PRS_ORG# on 12.12.19.
One of them already showed a defect (the fabric had a hole on the front of the chair).
I'm asking for help.
Air pumps are ideal for supplying an aquarium with additional oxygen.
It is also possible to operate a filter system using an air blower.
This series is offered in 3 variants by us.
Look at the bottom of the offer in the table.
Here you can see the services side by side.
If the pumps are strong enough, you can run an entire facility with them.
If you have a large aquarium, pumps with two or more outlets are suitable so that you can connect more than one outlet.
The MK series has one, two or four outlets, depending on the model, but there are also air pumps available to set an accent in the aquarium, e.g. with an air curtain (find them in our shop) or with a decoration that turns the air bubbles into a function.
Here, a treasure chest, a shell or something like that would be called a treasure chest.
The MK series has a special, sound-insulated construction and so produces low operating noise.
The installation is very easy.
The blower pump is connected to a 4/6 mm air hose...and it can then start.
The fan pump should be the same or higher than the water level and be mounted outside.
If the blower pump is placed lower than the water level, a check valve should be inserted between the pump and the water supply.
Simply cut the air hose and place the valve in between.
This would prevent it if the water were to flow backwards from the tank through the pump...
If the fan is to be installed outdoors, it should be covered and protected from the elements
The MK pumps are pure power packages that consume little energy
Even though we indicate here on eBay that the processing time is 3 days, the packages are packed and picked up daily.
Everything goes well on the way, it goes very quickly.
We just want to avoid causing anyone to be offended, even if it takes a little longer.
It would be so, not everyone has understanding for the employees who also work in the logistics industry...of course, here, Corona doesn't stop.
Please do not rate it badly just because the delivery is delayed, this is solely the fault of the parcel services.
Of course, people like to complain about these services, even though we say...they're having a hard time
This is also very different regionally.
Be kind to everyone, stay healthy and we all hope that better times are ahead.
How long does it take to order the yellow with and without armrest?
Can you also order the legs in white?
Amazon founder Jeff Bezos sends astronaut daughter and host into space
The daughter of the first American in space, a TV host and four other passengers have taken a short trip into space.
They were transported on Saturday by the rocket system "New Shepard" of the Blue Origin company, founded by Amazon founder Jeff Bezos.
The ten-minute flight took off and landed in the western US state of Texas.
Under a blue sky, Bezos personally welcomed the newly-crowned astronauts upon their return.
"Welcome back," said Bezos, in a blue spacesuit, as he opened the hatch to the capsule.
Under the applause of friends, family members and Blue Origin employees, the six passengers climbed out one by one and embraced the Amazon founder.
According to Blue Origin, it took ten minutes and 13 seconds to reach a height of 107 kilometers.
The 74-year-old Laura Shepard Churchley, daughter of the 1961-launched NASA astronaut Alan Shepard (1923-1998), who was named after the rocket system of Blue Origin, and the 50-year-old TV presenter Michael Strahan were guests of the company, who paid for their tickets: space engineer Dylan Taylor, investor Evan Dick, technology entrepreneur Lane Bess, and his son Cameron.
Blue Origin did not disclose how much each person paid for their ticket.
Laura Shepard Churchley remembered her father's mission after the short flight.
He had to work hard and do everything himself.
She just went along for the ride, the 74-year-old said with a laugh.
Michael Strahan also expressed his enthusiasm.
He would love to go back to space, the moderator said.
New Shepard will fly up to 100 kilometers
The rocket system "New Shepard" flies largely automatically.
The capsule detached from the rocket and reached an altitude of around 100 kilometers above the Earth, briefly experiencing weightlessness before the reusable object was slowed by large parachutes and landed.
The International Air Transport Association and many other experts see 100 kilometres above the Earth as the boundary between Earth and space, but there is no binding international regulation.
It was the third manned flight for Blue Origin, with Amazon founder Jeff Bezos on board with his brother Mark, an 82-year-old former US pilot, and a 18-year-old Dutchman.
The second one in October was attended by the 90-year-old Canadian actor William Shatner, who became famous for his role as "Captain Kirk" in "Star Trek", as well as the former NASA engineer Chris Boshuizen, the entrepreneur Glen de Vries and the deputy chief of Blue Origin, Audrey Powers.
Critics have accused Bezos and Blue Origin of pushing the space tourism business largely without scientific research interests in mind and without regard for the climate.
Simply press a button to choose whether your "Smart Stone" should always shine in one color or play its entire color palette.
When switched to color, the lightbulb will stay on a light color for about a minute before gently transitioning to the next decorative color.
The solid construction of the "Smart Stone" light is impervious to the elements.
In snowy surroundings, the light even shines particularly well - only with a shortened duration of light is to be expected once the days become shorter.
Please only pay attention in winter to ensure that no snow interferes with the solar module's function.
"Smart Stone" uses a NiMh battery in the common Mignon (AA) format, which can be easily replaced when needed.
You can obtain a suitable replacement battery from our webshop to extend the service life of your Deko lamp even further.
A high-gloss effect spray that makes smooth surfaces look like chrome.
Suitable for all smooth surfaces, particularly for the design of rims, radiator grilles, and painted plastic parts, when suitably pre-treated.
With this product, DUPLI-COLOR is offering for the first time a washable and weatherproof chrome spray.
The optimal effect is achieved on black backgrounds, e.g. by priming with DUPLI-COLOR TUNING Effect Primer.
Available as a single dose and in a set including the Effect Primer and dust-binding cloth for optimal preparation for painting.
For use on metal, wood, glass, lacquer-coated hard plastics, stone.
Perfect, that fits :) I don't need anything else to add?
They just need the tracking number in my email?
Someone who works in biochemistry or is studying biochemistry
I am currently studying biochemistry in the first semester and find the subject itself quite interesting, and I don't get distracted in the lab (I have already completed the inorganic chemistry practical).
I have also been thinking about career prospects since before I started studying, but at that time I was still thinking that I would definitely study until I got my doctorate.
At the moment, however, I have doubts, especially concerning my career prospects.
On one side (Studycheck etc) one hears all the time about great career opportunities and the job is highly sought after, but on the other side one hears about unemployed biologists and incredibly poorly paid jobs.
So I would really like to know:
1) What is she currently working on?
2) Are you satisfied with your work/salary?
3) What have you studied/ What training have you done?
4) Would you do it again?
Thank you for your answers!
I am currently very uncertain and am considering dropping out of my studies in 2022 and doing an apprenticeship as a specialist in computer science.
If you have experience, you can also write about it :)
Extra stress during holidays and weekends
This topic came up last week with me.
But I had to use my long weekend to relax.
That's why I'm only now putting up a post.
Not only during big holidays, like Christmas holidays, there is a lot of stress at our workplace.
As it appears, there are also bridge days before holidays plus bridge days on bridges.
It was like this: Last week was Mary's Ascension, which is called "Auffahrt" in Switzerland.
On Friday, most people and businesses take a bridge day, which is semi-official.
Last week, it was a long 4-day weekend at home.
What happened last week?
Everywhere stress.
Urgent emails that had to be sent before the weekend, assignments here and there, everything *absolutely* before the long weekend.
Because... well, why?
Because "next week" sounds so much like so much time and it can't be?
Or because people really want to do as much in a shortened week as they would in a normal one?
Not only was I stressed on Wednesday, but I was also powerfully annoyed.
What is this self-censorship for holidays?
What holidays do we have left if we can't enjoy them properly?!
The stress didn't come from above, the colleagues were all very self-sufficient in dealing with it.
My question is simply: Are we the only Swiss?
Is this our Reformed-Evangelical way?
Or do you know that in the north as well?
Yvonne Catterfeld is looking forward to Christmas in Thuringia
Yvonne Catterfeld (42) is looking forward to Christmas in her home state of Thuringia - but has no presents yet.
"Even if there is no snow in Erfurt, you just go to Ilmenau in the Thuringian Forest," said the actress and singer Hit Radio FFH.
She will get into the spirit of the festival by baking and decorating cookies with her son.
"I love it," said Catterfeld.
But until the sentimental days, she still has a lot to do: "For the first time, I have no gifts, I have to start now."
NEKTON-Bio supports a smooth course of the moult and feather renewal.
NEKTON-Bio contains all essential vitamins, amino acids, minerals, trace elements and 200,000 µg biotin/kg.
NEKTON-Bio gives the bird a smooth and shiny plumage.
The majority of feather damage in aviculture is due to nutritional deficiencies.
Since the plumage is made of protein-rich substances, a particularly rich and balanced protein diet for the bird is a prerequisite for the formation of a perfect feather.
For a functioning metabolism, the daily diet must contain sufficient vitamins, minerals and trace elements.
Most of the animal losses during molting are due to inadequate or imbalanced protein intake and/or deficiencies in vitamins and minerals.
The composition of NEKTON-Bio takes the unfavorable amino acid ratio in most plant-based feeds into account and balances it.
No other vitamin preparations should be administered during the use of NEKTON-Bio.
NEKTON Bio is water-soluble and can be administered directly into the water or into the soft food.
Thank you, I found it
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work
DDR model workshop model E-Lok E 95 03 DRG/ DR, the locomotive was in use in Schlesien and Central Germany, the very rare locomotive probably comes from the conversion proposal of the model railroader ME Heft 11/1968, used with play tracks and missing parts, see photos, the E 95 series is a heavy freight electric locomotive of the Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft (DRG), designed for the traction of heavy coal trains in the Schleswig-Holstein network, possibly comes from the small-scale company ZSCHUTSCHKE and BACHMANN.
A locomotive is on display at the DB Museum in Halle (Saale) and has been restored to working order.
The Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft had the AEG company commissioned in 1924 to prepare proposals for an electric locomotive that should be able to pull 2,200-tonne coal trains and 530-tonne passenger trains at a speed of 45 km/h.
The maximum speed was required to be 65 km/h.
Thus, the DRG determined in March 1926 that the delivery would be as a 1'Co+Co1' locomotive with Tatzlager drive from AEG, with the mechanical parts supplied by Siemens-Schuckertwerke and the electrical parts by the Siemens-Schuckertwerke.
From December 1927 to June 1928, six locomotives were delivered with the numbers E 95 01–06.
Everyone survived the Second World War and found themselves again on the territory of the later DDR.
In 1946, the locomotives were sent as reparations to the Soviet Union.
They returned to Germany until November 1952.
The readiness of all six locomotives was established at the Reichsbahnausbesserungswerk Dessau.
[4] As the electrification of the middle German network progressed, a growing demand for locomotives for heavy freight service arose, and in 1959 the three locomotives E 95 01 to E 95 03 were overhauled, with the remaining machines serving as spare parts donors.
First, the E 04, E 44 and E 94, which were available in large quantities, were preferred for construction.
Only when it became clear that the number of recoveries could not be increased any further, did the E 95 come back into focus of the recovery process.
[4] First, the locomotives were stationed at the Leipzig-Wahren railway workshop.
They arrived at the railway workshop Halle P. in 1960.
They were used in their own schedule to haul coal trains from the Geiseltal towards Halle, Leipzig and Erfurt.
With increasing age, the complex control of the locomotives became problematic.
This often resulted in shooters getting their hands sticky when handling ammunition.
Then the on-board assistant, who was always travelling with the locomotive, had to release the trigger during the journey with a hammer and an axe.
Damage to the drive motors frequently occurred and led to months of downtime for the locomotive.
[5] By the end of the 1960s, there were enough new locomotives available and an expansion of the electric service was not planned, so the Reichsbahn was able to retire the E 95 locomotives.
In addition, Deutsche Reichsbahn wanted to operate its electric locomotives with only one driver, which would have caused problems in the train operation due to the aforementioned difficulties with the machines and the visibility from the driver's cab.
[5] After mid-1969, the E 95 02 and E 95 03 were taken out of service, followed by the E 95 01, which quit service on October 5, 1970.
The intended new designation 255 001 was never used.
All the locomotives were dismantled except for the E 95 02.
The E 95 02 was installed as a replacement for the future museum locomotive E 77 10 as a switch heating facility at the main station in Halle.
It took some time before the authorities at the Reichsbahn were convinced that the E 95 should be preserved as a museum locomotive.
In 1979, the initial external reconstruction of the locomotive began with the goal of presenting it at a vehicle show in RAW Dessau.
[5] Since then, it has been part of the Dresden Transport Museum as a non-operational museum locomotive.
In 1986, the interior of the locomotive was completed.
The locomotive is cared for in the DB Museum Halle (Saale) in a museum setting.
Since 1995, employees of the tradition association Bw Halle P have been working on the operational restoration of the locomotive.
In April 2015, the locomotive was presented for the first time at an exhibition in the Museum-Bw Arnstadt with a new interior and exterior livery, where the transformers were checked and five traction motors were operational.
The locomotives were in use on the Silesian Mountain Railway and its branch lines until 1945, where they proved their reliable drive and low maintenance.
In February 1945, the machines were relocated to the Mitteldeutscher Netz.
The main area of operation was initially Silesia
Handcrafted model H0 in OVP, functioning well, optical adjustments to the loco in self-work are necessary, dusty, with play tracks, cellar smell !!!, very rare handcrafted model, very small edition, possibly comes from the small-series company ZSCHUTSCHKE and BACHMANN
The packaging may have labels and storage marks.
Yes, the F parts are it
I received a bed from you.
However, there were problems with one part.
The beam is held up by two feet...unfortunately, these are too narrow and the beam cannot be mounted on the feet.
What are we doing now?
I can't build the bed.
The middle beam is held up by two feet, unfortunately these feet are faulty.
The middle beam doesn't fit into the intended holder.
So I get new ones sent to me.
When will they be released?
No flat surfaces.
According to the assembly instructions, these are the correct ones from the form, they were only too narrow
But that's not important.
As long as they fulfill their purpose
They are not flat with me
Could I have received this?
Hello #NAME#, can I explain the problem to you again?
House fire with two light injuries and high damage
Two people were slightly injured in a fire in a house in Upper Bavaria.
In addition, a damage of several hundred thousand euros has been caused, as the police reported on Sunday.
The fire had probably spread from a carport to the adjacent house in Kinsau (district of Landsberg am Lech).
According to reports, two residents were taken to the hospital on Sunday with mild smoke inhalation.
The exact cause of the fire was not known at first, but the police did not assume arson.
The Fürstenfeldbruck Kripo has taken over the further investigations.
But it comes later
And I have to pay shipping costs again
To debunk fake news - Biontech CEO publishes vaccine photo
Uğur Şahin published a photo of his first vaccination on the social network "LinkedIn" in early 2021
Biontech CEO Uğur Şahin has not publicly commented on his vaccination status.
Now the entrepreneur published a photo showing his Corona vaccination.
His friend's illness prompted him to share the news with Şahin.
The CEO and co-founder of the Mainz-based company Biontech, Uğur Şahin, has published a photo showing him receiving a coronavirus vaccine.
On social media, there were false claims that I was not vaccinated.
In fact, my wife and I have received three doses of the Biontech-Pfizer vaccine," Şahin wrote in a post on the network "LinkedIn" on Friday.
"For some months now, my friends have been urging me to post a photo of me getting vaccinated in order to counteract these false rumors."
So far, he has rejected it because the communication should not revolve around him.
But a call last week has changed his mind: "I was deeply saddened to learn that an old school friend of mine is currently fighting for his life.
He is fighting a severe Covid-19 infection and has been on a ventilator for three weeks.
The school friend and his family were not vaccinated, Şahin wrote.
He did not ask for the reasons.
"The most common cause, however, appears to be fear, which is often fuelled by misinformation and mistrust."
Fear can only be fought with facts, sometimes it is better to share personal experiences.
An interview with Deutsche Welle is circulating on the internet in which Uğur Şahin says he is not vaccinated.
However, the video was created in December 2020, as Deutsche Welle itself clarified.
"I am currently not allowed to get the vaccine myself," Şahin said at the time.
In Germany, there is a priority for the administration of the vaccine.
The prioritisation has since been cancelled - and the CEO of Biontech himself has been vaccinated three times, according to his own statements.
Fire in transformer station: Hundreds of thousands of people without power
In several municipalities in North Rhine-Westphalia, the lights went out on Friday evening: no electricity and in many cases, no heating either.
A fire had disabled a substation.
Thousands of people in the Rhein-Sieg district of North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany, had to go without power for around 24 hours after a fire at an electrical substation.
On Friday evening, 41,000 residents and residents in several towns turned off their lights due to the fire.
Westnetz reported that numerous emergency power supplies were in operation on Saturday until the widespread outage was finally resolved late in the evening.
Firefighters and helpers and helpers of the THW provided assistance in the municipalities.
Authorities offered childcare places in schools and appealed for help from neighbours.
The supplier thanked the affected people for their patience and the helpers for their efforts.
We are very aware that the last 24 hours have imposed significant restrictions.
We would also like to thank the affected municipalities, the district, the fire departments and the THW for their tireless efforts," said Florian Witt, head of the primary technology area, in a statement on Saturday evening.
The repairs to the damage will take a few more days, as Westnetz engineers were only able to restore some of the cables temporarily, he explained.
The fire was caused by a technical defect, according to the company.
Electricity is flowing again
The fire that broke out at 19:15 on Friday has damaged parts of the 10,000-volt switching station in Neunkirchen-Seelscheid according to Westnetz.
There are extensive cleaning and repair works to be carried out there.
In parallel, a connection to a 30,000-volt voltage level was created.
With this bypass, the power supply is restored.
Since Saturday at 6 p.m., over 21,000 people in Much and Ruppichteroth have had power again.
Another 20,000 residents of Neunkirchen-Seelscheid were gradually switched on from 21.30.
Since 23:15, the last affected people have also had power.
More than 80 Westnetz employees and partner companies were involved.
The authorities had called for neighbourhood help on Saturday afternoon to set up a backup power supply for important buildings.
"It is now important that citizens take care of their older or single neighbours and report to the local fire station when help is needed," explained Landrat Sebastian Schuster (CDU) after a crisis meeting.
When setting up and operating emergency power generators, the focus was primarily on the residents of nursing homes.
In addition, temporary care facilities have been set up in schools for those people who were unable to care for themselves or who required medical equipment that was not available in the community, or who required medical care.
Guten Tag!
Unfortunately, the ceiling in Germany is sold out.
Can I buy it from you and pay in Euros?
It is the day cover #PRS_ORG# in blue-green.
I hope you have a good day and stay healthy ♡
But I can't mount it on the table top.
It is Custom #NAME#.
There are three versions of this.
We wanted those with tabletops of #NUMBER#
We received a diameter of 155 cm.
Today my #PRS_ORG came, but I cannot fit it in and thus shorten it.
Can you help me further?
Otherwise I would have to return them, as they are not suitable for the purpose.
I would be delighted to hear from you
That's really easy!
Then we'll do it!
Will you send me the return receipt by mail?
The repair is now complete.
I had already tried this before the chat.
However, I had not restarted the E-#PRS_ORG# before the purchase.
Should I do that now?
I find it almost insulting to get such a low credit score.
We are not in agreement with that
Nordic combined: Kombiner Riiber wins
The German Nordic combiners Fabian Rießle and Julian Schmid have finished on the podium at the World Cup in Otepää, Estonia.
The duo had to give in once again to the outstanding Norwegian Jarl Magnus Riiber, who had already started the race with a big lead after the ski jumping.
Retrieve job #NUMBER#.
When will the money be transferred back to my account?
Yes, we both made a new version 4.5...
It could be that she has heard of the problem before
I bought a book directly with my #PRS_ORG#, it seems to be on there too.
When I want to open it, the message pops up, ups!
This document cannot be opened.
The file may be defective, they should report it to customer service.
As far as I can tell it is a #PRS_ORG# epub file.
Can you help me further?
Chat connection is down and now?
I also have to work in between!
To ensure an even and clean application, you should clean the parts with soapy water to remove dust, fat and fingerprints, rinse with clear water and dry thoroughly.
Before you use the paintbrush for the first time with a new color, it is advisable to practice 2 to 3 strokes.
You can do this on the inner side of the components or on a yogurt cup.
The first mark on the component
Draw the pencil in a straight line, side by side.
Later, the light overlap of the color layers results in a uniform surface.
Avoid fast back and forth wiping with the brush.
This results in unrealistic areas.
A model is not a garden fence.
Start with the bright colours.
The dark ones could later show through.
Metallic tones and metallic colours come in at the end with a separate brush.
Otherwise, it can lead to unsightly metallic sheen when mixed with normal colours.
Let the painted parts dry for one day before you varnish them.
The models achieve a faithful appearance through decals or stickers.
Decals on aircraft, ship names, and car models: The decals give the model the final touch.
Bring the decals in the correct order to the parts that are still accessible.
A cockpit can be fitted or fitted more easily before it is installed in the fuselage.
More important than the right tool, such as a saw, pliers and tweezers, is time, patience and a steady hand.
Cut out each decal you need and arrange them to your liking.
Decals are also called water slide pictures because you just wet the back side of the paper with water until the backing paper turns dark.
Then you move the picture just a little bit off the paper and place the piece on the corresponding place on the model (which you have also previously moistened).
While you hold the decal in place with a tool, you pull the backing paper away from the decal.
Caution: Check first that the picture is in the right place before you remove it completely from the paper, so that it doesn't stick, knit or even tear.
Excess water is absorbed with a household towel.
Not suitable for children under 3 years
I can only open a book for a short time when I look for something else, then I can't read the book anymore and have to sign out and sign in again and load the book again and look for the place where I was reading.
On Saturday, I already communicated with you.
Can I get this by email?
For all three packages?
Because the lamp came in three separate packages to me
Thank you very much anyway!
Then I will buy elsewhere once the money comes back.
But can I get it back without a problem?
Infertility treatment with PKV / What is an "insurance case"?
Hello everyone,
We were in fertility treatment for some time, now that it's time to settle up with the PKV, this suddenly becomes a problem.
One by one:
We had applied for fertility treatment in advance with PKV and were granted permission for three attempts.
The experiments were not restricted in any way (e.g. time frame, success, etc.).
The first attempt led directly to a successful pregnancy and birth, which was paid for with the PKV.
Some time later, we tried to have a second child, and carried out 2 (unsuccessful) attempts, but did not count these towards the PKV.
We applied again for reimbursement from the PKV and were granted three more attempts.
After a few more attempts (we have conducted more experiments than promised, logically the most expensive ones are with the PKV), we submitted the bills to the PKV and got the bad surprise: instead of 5 experiments (2+3), the PKV will only pay for 3 experiments.
The reason: With pregnancy/birth, the other two attempts of the first offer are lost.
The second child wish is a new insurance case.
However, according to the AGB, "The insurance case begins with the treatment and ends when treatment is no longer required."
The questions to the experts in the round here:
* Who is right, the PKV (only three attempts are reimbursed) or we (five attempts to be reimbursed)?
* Had the PKV made us aware that with a birth the further attempts would fail?
* Is the wish for a second child really a new insurance case?
Infertility (due to blocked fallopian tubes) cannot be cured by the first child.
It would be great if the experts here could give their opinion.
Thank you very much for your help!
Could you please send me the three variants by email and tell me how I can reach them best?
Okay.
We will no longer order anything from them.
When they add up the transactions of me and my friend #NAME# (same address), they have obviously lost a good customer.
They are happy to pass it on to their manager.
That's not competitive.
Yesterday, my colleague told me that the refund was initiated and now you are telling me that I have to return the thing.
I can't do anything about the fact that the chest of drawers arrives completely broken at my place
Please look at the screenshot to see what the colleague wrote
It is clear and clear that the refund was requested and I have still not received a refund from #PRS_ORG#
They can tell their manager that they've lost two regulars.
My friend has also ordered various furniture for our apartment through his account.
We will not do that anymore.
No, the defect only appeared after a few months.
A desk chair must be able to withstand normal use.
Otherwise they cannot sell him as a desk chair.
Regardless of this, the guarantee is valid for 24 months.
No, I am not able to obtain another type of packaging.
I will dismantle the cabinet and make it available to the transport company.
Guten Tag, ich habe eine Frage zu Ihrer Serie von #PRS_ORG#
These products are advertised with additional purchases, but we were unable to find them with you.
Can they help?
The topic of the week: The best low budget films
What a low-budget film is, there is no general definition with exact budget limits.
Wikipedia has this to say about it:
A **low-budget film** or **low-budget movie** is a motion picture shot with little to no funding from a major film studio or private investor.
There are plenty of lists of low-budget films to be found online, such as on Letterboxd.com.
Do you know any interesting representatives of this category?
What do you find interesting about that?
And what do you not like at all?
I am a very good customer of yours, and have already furnished two apartments with your furniture.
Wanted to ask the best price for the gray leather sofa Odelle.
The delivery time has now been extended again, is this now also reliable?
Thank you
Best regards
There is no phone number, a chat where one has to wait for 30 minutes is not a chat!
Unfortunately, nothing changes in the waiting position...I give up again, because it just doesn't work here.
Hello
"Half victory" against Belarus with high costs for the EU
According to political expert Raphael Bossong, the EU can declare a "half victory" in the conflict with the Belarusian regime.
However, the costs were very high and meant massive violations of the rights of migrants and refugees at the Belarus border with Poland and Lithuania, said Bossong to the Evangelical Press Service (epd).
The EU has not been able to resolve the confrontation, the researcher of the Berlin-based Stiftung Wissenschaft und Politik (SWP) explained.
This state of limbo - Belarus is not giving up at all, but the EU feels like a winner - will probably go on for a while yet.
The treatment of people at the border is not in line with the European Convention on Human Rights, Bossong concluded.
Apparently, there is an "increasing normalization of pushbacks" by individual EU governments.
Since the EU as a whole is not willing to take a stand against this, this will come at the expense of fundamental rights.
This development also weakens the unity of the Union.
"It cannot be enforced if a member state puts its mind to it," as Poland, which does not even allow Frontex, the EU border security agency, access to its border.
In addition, the EU pays a price for its policy at the border with Belarus, according to Bossong: A consensus on asylum policy has become more difficult, as the line "border protection, border protection, border protection" has been strengthened.
Another attempt to cross the border
According to Poland's border guard, migrants have once again tried to cross into Polish territory from Belarus.
Fifty-five migrants were arrested in the night from Saturday to Sunday and returned to the border, a spokeswoman for the authority said on Sunday.
The Polish officers were pelted with stones by the migrants near the town of Czeremsza.
According to reports, a soldier was struck in the face and had to be medically attended to by a military doctor.
Border protection registered 52 attempted border crossings within 24 hours.
On Friday evening, a group of 28 migrants had already crossed the border.
Thousands of people from countries like Iraq and Afghanistan have crossed the border between Belarus and the EU in the past months or attempted to do so.
The EU accuses Alexander Lukashenko of being the leader of Minsk, luring them with the prospect of entry into the EU.
According to press reports, Poland and Lithuania have set up border checkpoints.
The EU sanctioned Belarus and threatened airlines that brought migrants and refugees into the country.
In addition, EU commissioners travelled to the countries of origin of the people in order to prevent them from leaving.
The most effective element of the EU reaction is the pressure on the airlines, said Bossong.
"The EU has thrown its market power into the balance and demonstrated its resolve with hard bandages and extraterritorial sanctions."
Minsk must also take into account the political costs at home.
The Belarusian society is not set up to allow the security apparatus to routinely herd thousands of people through the country.
Mercedes protests after controversial Formula 1 finale
Max Verstappen is said to have committed two rule violations during the race, according to Mercedes.
Abu Dhabi - After the controversial Formula 1 finale in Abu Dhabi, Mercedes has filed an appeal.
The silver arrows suggest two rule breaches in the last Grand Prix of the year.
A protest relates to a supposed breach of the rules by Max Verstappen in the Red Bull during the last Safety Car phase, when he overtook unsafely.
A second protest was lodged against the final race result.
According to Mercedes, the protocol was not followed.
Verstappen overtook Lewis Hamilton on the last lap to win his first Formula 1 title.
The manoeuvre was carried out shortly after the end of a safety car phase in which the Dutchman had been overtaken by the car ahead of him.
I'm checking that.
I'm speaking with the bank and I'll be back in touch with you
Thank you for the support
Free admission for members: Europa-Park is hosting SC Freiburg fantag
The Europa-Park, the namesake of the Europa-Park Stadium of the Sport-Club Freiburg, has invited the SC Freiburg fans.
According to the park, members and long-term ticket holders of the Sport-Club from the Breisgau as well as members of the fan community were able to visit the Europa-Park for free on this day.
In addition, there were coupons for drinks and sausages.
On this day, the roller coasters were lit up in red and white.
Fuchsle, the Euromouse and many red and white balloons provided the perfect backdrop," the park said.
The cooperation between the Bundesliga club and the leisure park in Rust, 40 kilometres north of Freiburg, has been in place since the early 1990s.
At the first SC Freiburg fan day in Europa-Park, it was once again shown how well the partnership fits.
Seeing the shining fans having fun in the roller coaster confirms this," says Europa Park owner Jürgen Mack.
Why is it €#NUMBER# and not €1,699 as originally?
Verstappen's career stages as the new world champion
The Dutchman Max Verstappen is the new Formula 1 world champion.
Max Verstappen has done it.
The Dutchman is winning his first world championship in his seventh year in Formula 1.
His path to the top of the King's Class:
Abu Dhabi - 2012, Italy: Verstappen lost the karting world championship after a crash in Sarno.
Father Jos Verstappen made him angry on the way back by stopping at a gas station.
His mother, Sophie Kumpen, is collecting the teenager in the car behind.
2014, England: Red Bull's junior team in England has a promising new recruit for 2014.
The 16-year-old is following in the footsteps of Sebastian Vettel and Daniel Ricciardo.
He then continues to compete in European Formula 3 for the time being.
2015, Australia: Verstappen started at the age of 17 years and 166 days as the youngest driver in history to start a Grand Prix.
Because of a defect, he had to prematurely retire his Toro Rosso in Melbourne.
2015, Malaysia: The then Toro Rosso driver Verstappen was 17 years and 180 days old, making him the youngest driver to score points in Formula 1.
Verstappen finished seventh in the Malaysian Grand Prix at Sepang.
2016, Spain: In his first race for Red Bull, Verstappen wins.
At 18 years and 228 days, he becomes the youngest Formula 1 Grand Prix winner in history.
2019, Hungary: Verstappen celebrates his pole position debut in Budapest - he is not the youngest.
At the age of 21, he lets Valtteri Bottas and his Mercedes teammate Lewis Hamilton go.
2021, Abu Dhabi: The summit has been reached.
Verstappen celebrates with 24 years at the Formula 1 finale in Abu Dhabi his first world title - with an overtake against Hamilton in the final lap. dpa
I had #NUMBER# with you already when I ordered the #PRS_ORG# commode.
Judith Hermann read from her novel "Daheim"
As part of the reading series "LiteraTour Nord", author Judith Hermann read from her latest novel "Daheim" at the sold-out Blue Note on Friday and served as a moderator.
She is divorced, lives in a house by the coast and listens sensitively to the nocturnal sounds at her front door.
I left the contact form to return an article yesterday, but have not received any email confirmation or similar.
My question is whether my request has been received.
Not everyone has the time for your messed up chat and cheap goods from China.
Their mistake, which they should fix and not all from our household.
Contact Mrs #NAME#.
I can't chat with them every day
Yesterday we chatted and agreed that I or Mrs #NAME# would receive an email with a 60 Euro voucher, a repeat order of the #PRS_ORG# nightstand and a return label.
This email has not yet been received.
The package is still looking to #PRS_ORG# today.
Please contact me
Yours sincerely
The LokSound 5 decoder can output up to 10 channels simultaneously.
Each channel can be sampled up to 16 bits / 31250 kHz and offers finally HiFi quality on your system.
It is practically no longer audible difference from the original.
A Class-D audio power amplifier with up to 3W output power controls the speakers, which can have a range of 4 Ohm to 32 Ohm impedance.
The huge 128 Mbit sound storage provides enough capacity.
All individual sounds can be adjusted in volume.
The super-flexible sound engine without a rigid timetable allows for the precise simulation of all conceivable rail vehicles.
Three independently adjustable brake functions and two alternative load scenarios give you maximum control over your vehicles.
Sorry but just because he says he is not anti-Semitic doesn't mean anything.
That's like when an anti-immigrant says he has nothing against foreigners.
Neither of them will admit to it.
But Kollegah constantly reproduces anti-Semitic messages.
If you want to distance yourself, then you should just do it completely.
Yes, then you are not taking him as seriously as Kollegah.
Anyone who seriously questions evolution is simply lost.
Somehow, a god has brought it all about.
But once you become a creationist, you must believe that the Earth is 10,000 years old and science is nonsense.
And with that you are an enemy of science and not to be taken seriously like Kollegah
To achieve an optimal field of vision, the loupe should be held as close as possible to the eye.
The specially designed aplanatic-achromatic lens system allows you to use the microscope practically error-free in the edge zone.
Magnification is often marked on lenses.
However, these figures only apply to precisely defined conditions, which rarely correspond to the operating conditions.
In order to make the most of your loupe, we ask you to take note of the information in the "Technical data" table (see instructions in the packaging).
On the surfaces of all optical devices, including contact lenses, light reflections are created.
By applying an anti-reflection coating, these reflections are significantly reduced.
Reflections on the lens surfaces are less noticeable if the optimal usage conditions are adhered to - the lens close to the eye.
Further information can be found in the accompanying instructions (available in both German and English).
Zeiss VisuCard Lupe Scheckkartenlupe Vergrößerung Taschenlupe Leselupe Lesehilfe
As a reading aid on the go or simply for everyday use: The Zeiss VisuCard is the ideal helper, as it can be taken anywhere thanks to its compact format.
And their hard shell makes them robust against special stresses in the old days.
Every pair of glasses comes with a wallet-sized card for storage and safe transport.
They offer these parts that you can see in the pictures or under "What we offer".
What condition is the offered article in?
Of course, everyone can miss something once in a while, because no one is free of mistakes - should this happen, just write a message and it will be sorted out (either by exchange, partial refund or full refund).
They get a proper invoice.
It is sent, unless otherwise requested by the buyer, with tracking number via DHL!
Please note that the individual shipping costs are taken from the above shipping conditions.
There are no additional handling costs.
ok, say all the authorities, how can I check it more precisely?
Yes, both email addresses
#PRS_ORG# I will do very nice and good service, although it took a while until someone came, you were super
Hello dear #PRS_ORG# team,
I have already reported to you under customer contact with the number #PHONENUMBER#.
Yes, but it was before.
They cannot deliver to England due to #PRS_ORG#.
Christmas tree sales in Schönwolde: In the town of Krembz, women are looking for Christmas trees
Landowner Frank Diers has already experienced many strange situations when selling Christmas trees.
One man even drove home alone once, because he couldn't agree with his partner.
Every year, he plants 2000 of them.
The 56-year-old has already experienced many strange situations.
That makes the run-up to Christmas always a bit funny, he says.
And with the voucher?
Otherwise I'm a customer?!
After all, I received a defective delivery and now paid the full price for it.
Then I will also rate it accordingly!
We don't need to discuss which court is better, but there is a certain similarity between the two.
Both consist of meat that is grilled on a rotating spit.
And both have their names.
In German, an equivalent might be something like the "Dreher", which is far from tasty.
Problems with fiber optic + Devolo DLan/Magic
We have had a new fibre optic connection in the house for a few weeks.
Unfortunately, I have problems building a stable Wi-Fi network.
Previously, I had a DSL 50 Mbit connection and used Devolo DLan, which received and sent 50 Mbit without any problems.
The new fiber connection sends 500 Mbit to the FritzBox 7590 and the DLan module connected to it also receives these speeds.
However, the other module, which sends out the WiFi, does not send out the full 500 anymore, but the further I am in the house with the module, the less it sends out (so use a power outlet that is 1, 2, 3, etc. rooms away from the other module).
This leads to the fact that the internet with the new fiber connection is now even slower than before (\~45 Mbit).
I have also ordered a new Devolo Magic set, which apparently uses a new technology.
This was slightly better than the DLan, but here too there were similar large losses.
Could someone explain why so much internet speed is lost through the power line?
And is LAN really the solution?
It would be extremely complicated to lay LAN cable in that house.
I am really desperate, so I have created an extra account just for this.
Therefore, I would be very interested in an answer.
When it's time to switch the Giro account
He who thought that now there would be peace at the Giro accounts, is deceived.
While many banks have used the autumn to confirm past fee hikes with their customers, the free allowances for negative interest rates continue to fall.
The Deutsche Bank, for example, was considered relatively generous with a limit of 100,000 euros for a long time.
Now she has simply halved her allowance and even quartered her daily allowance.
In the first step, the limit was lowered only for customers of the Postbank division - to 50,000 euros for Giro and investment accounts and 25,000 euros for current accounts.
However, the lower interest rates now apply to the entire Deutsche Bank, as a spokesperson confirmed in response to a request.
And not only for new contracts, but also for "new individual agreements with existing customers".
The Commerzbank had already gone down to a limit of 50,000 euros, which still applies, as does that of ING Germany.
The direct bank DKB, which is popular with cost-conscious customers, has reduced the free amounts in two stages, initially to 50,000 euros, and now to 25,000 euros.
After all, more than 100 banks have now offered a free amount of up to 25,000 euros or less according to figures from the Internet portal Verivox.
The Sparda Bank Berlin has also arrived at 25,000 euros: However, there is still a legal dispute with the consumer centres, which won the first instance court case against this regulation.
Now, banks are already discussing whether they should set aside provisions - in the event that the higher authorities ultimately declare the negative interest rates to be unlawful and many millions of bank customers must be refunded.
Instead of the table for 6 people, they delivered the table for 8 people.
The lower part is for 6 people.
Jennifer Aniston has a whole beauty army
She is now officially at the top of Hollywood.
But their lives are like a climb up and down a mountain.
Jennifer Aniston (52) was voted the most influential woman of the year by the US magazine "The Hollywood Reporter".
For those who made a splash in 2021 with the "Friends" reunion and the continuation of their series "The Morning Show," this success is primarily the result of a lot of discipline and hard work.
To look the part, an army of assistants, stylists and trainers are on hand.
At least, Aniston says, give yourself one chip a day (yes, that's one single chip out of the bag).
That their hearts should fly equally to both female and male fans is really a miracle.
Maybe because she's just unlucky in love - and still looking for the great love.
And the baby wish from the list.
Previously, she was constantly asked when she would become a mother.
That hurt her.
The people who asked had no idea what was going on with me medically, why I couldn't.
It was really hurtful.
It remains to be hoped that success and fame will also bring happiness.
A disgraceful end to a career: Räikkönen must retire
Kimi Räikkönen's departure from Formula 1 was quieter than expected.
Abu Dhabi - The 42-year-old Finn took off his gloves and wiped sweat from his forehead.
That was it.
After a driving error and a light contact with the barrier, Räikkönen had to retire from the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix, not even halfway through the race, with his Alfa Romeo.
It was his 349th and last Grand Prix, the "Iceman" ending his career in the motorsport kingdom.
His wife Minttu and the two children also went to the United Arab Emirates for the farewell.
Räikkönen's greatest success was winning the 2007 World Championship in a Ferrari.
He won 21 Grand Prix races, started 18 times from pole and finished on the podium 103 times. dpa
Friedrich wins 60th World Cup - Nolte wins two-man bob - Sport
The Norwegian biathlete Ole Einar Björndalen's mark of 94 successes is the goal of the bob pilot.
"I have calculated that I would need to win nine and a half races a season to make it to Cortina 2026," said the double Olympic champion from BSC Oberbärenburg, who won two races in two days at the Winterberg races.
He first defended against Johannes Lochner's attack by 0.5 seconds on Saturday, moving up from third place to first.
Then he changed something in the material setting and drove away with a 0.30 second lead on Sunday.
With his team Thorsten Margis (SV Halle), Candy Bauer (BSC Oberbärenburg) and Alexander Schüller (SV Halle), he defeated the Briton Brad Hall.
Third place went to the Austrian Benjamin Maier.
"We have taken greater risks today and have been rewarded," said Friedrich, who also reached his 22nd consecutive victory.
Johannes Lochner, who was driving to Stuttgart, came fifth this time, having previously finished second.
Christoph Hafer from the BC Bad Feilnbach landed in fourth place in the first race and in eighth place overall.
"If I knew what he was doing, I would do it too," said Lochner.
Nolte with home victory - podium for Jamanka
In the women's event, Laura Nolte brought home the third season victory in the two-woman bob.
After finishing fourth in the monobob on the previous day, she stormed to victory in the world cup with anchorwoman Deborah Levi on Sunday.
Olympic champion Mariama Jamanka from the BRC Thüringen bobsleigh team came in second place with Germany's fastest sprinter, Alexandra Burghardt from Burghausen.
She also secured her first podium of the season with her Olympic qualification.
The Wiesbaden resident Kim Kalicki landed in third place with Leonie Fiebig.
For me, it was supercool to be on the podium in the World Cup, I am superhappy that Mariama is taking me with her.
I'm super happy with the development.
There is still a lot of potential at the start, but the start times today were okay," said Burghardt and emphasized: "It's not just about pushing, but there is a lot to do around it."
Jamanka was a little irritated by the not quite error-free journeys, but said: "It's going in the right direction."
I had the ceiling in my shopping cart and could now buy it!
What should I do?
I haven't received it yet so I haven't been able to redeem it, so I finally asked.
Last year, due to Corona, I had completely different problems and no time for it.
And now it was said that it was over, which made me very angry.
Check out the chat about the Asare chair.
I would like to return it and then order it again, as it is currently reduced :)
Why is the shipping only starting on March 16th?
There was nothing on your website about such a long delivery time
No, until I click on it, an extra field with the message appears.
It was taken away by your colleague yesterday.
Why is this a problem today
I have also sent you pictures of the wrong item.
But we still want the cabinet module, a new, undamaged one.
And not to cancel the whole order.
Only this day, only this week, only until XY...
Hello dear lovely ladies and girls and women,
I have a lot of things I just want to write down and maybe it will help someone - or the other way around...
I'm 24, I have kPTBS, I'm a full-time student and a dog mama - aside from the fact that my dog doesn't bark or go to kindergarten, he's actually 1 to 1 my child.
My friend (since 6th grade) is sick, has a 2nd degree burn from Monday and has been depressed for years (but is now in therapy).
Yesterday I visited him because I have emotional needs and because I want to see and feel him, we cuddled a lot and it was nice.
I helped him shower (because his hand was bandaged due to burns).
He is also cold and we see each other less (1-2x a week) which makes me very uncomfortable with regards to affection and love.
My dog is feeling sick, I cooked for him and now he is lying in his blanket and has calmed down after I gave him the heat lamp and petting.
I live alone with my sister and my mother, and she's away for a month.
Now we also have to do chores at home, which we will have to divide up.
But cooking is just so much work for me...
My PTBS illness is currently well managed, I'm half-way through treatment and I'm coping.
Not good, but I'm coping and am almost symptom-free.
My university requires a lot (for me), tomorrow at 15h I have a written test that I haven't prepared for, and the next day I have an anatomy class that I should at least prepare a little for.
And next week I have an oral exam on Tuesday, and what comes afterwards is written down in my calendar and not in my head because there is no more room.
So my week goes: Only until tomorrow, then it's the weekend.
But after that, what happens?
Only until the birthday.
Only until the beginning of the summer holidays.
Only until the weekend.
Only until...
And so it goes on forever.
I think I'm just stressed out enough that I need these mental cues, otherwise I just can't do it.
Somehow I feel guilty and "chaotic," but I can't seem to do it differently...
Do you feel the same way?
I am infinitely grateful that I don't have to work.
I can't even put into words how grateful I am.
I don't know if I would have survived my captivity otherwise.
I think that has a lot to do with women's mental load and that's why I thought I would find kindred spirits here...
I wish you all a restful evening, the week is almost over!
I received my order today, unfortunately the whole other colour plus surface is scratched and the table top has a mark.
In the first delivery, the color was exactly as it was on the website.
We are very disappointed!!!!
What can you offer me?
If we switch tables, I'll get another color or what?
The cancellation email was sent on 26.12.#NUMBER#.
In fact, twice.
However, it is not confirmed.
Something completely different: I noticed in school that many religion teachers do not believe in God and for them it is just another subject like maths or geography.
For me, it was always a bit strange, maybe because I was raised Christian and I always believed in some way.
How do you feel about that?
Maybe you can tell a story about work or study colleagues with different attitudes.
In general, I understand the difference between private and professional and it is sensible to separate them.
It also has a curriculum, etc.
But it would be odd to have a physics teacher who doesn't believe in relativity.
Why would you want to teach religion if you don't believe in it?
Culture preserve or something?
I hope your question is not too personal.
Can it be changed or not? I understand English well
That's already very long, I would stop watching then
That's good, thank you.
I expect to receive a reply in the near future, at the latest by the beginning of next week.
Thanks for your support #NAME#.
Help me find a film
Hello dear people,
I'm looking for a film from my childhood (I'm 24).
I think it was a film for teenagers.
The film has two time periods (or parallel worlds).
Firstly, the modern (real) world.
On the other hand, the past (or the realm of the dead) (not quite sure).
Since I can't describe it in greater detail in the real world, there is a young woman.
And in the realm of the dead, a young soldier (in uniform similar to those of the soldiers in The Curse of the Caribbean).
For some reason, the paths cross and an action is created.
The antagonist is also a soldier from the Reich of the Dead who wants to bring the woman there in order to live herself, I think.
I think the transition is also the soldier's grave.
At the end, both soldiers fight each other.
If that speaks to you, I'm grateful for any response.
Our little one has only slept on their back since week 1.
Fast forward: lives still :D
Relax.
Such a child holds more than one might think.
Make sure everything is in order, no cuddly animals, go back and check occasionally, but no surveillance.
That makes you crazy!
Fresh air in the room.
A good mattress.
No pillows.
Ah, and ours didn't have a sleeping bag, but always had a blanket.
Watch your child when they sleep.
Does it turn the head to the side?
Can it be straightened from the inside?
Or is it lying face down on the mattress?
You can check to see if everything is in order.
We've all grown up, and when my husband was born, it was like everyone laid the kids on their bellies to sleep.
In addition, we are already "regular customers" with you and have already bought many articles
But why are you only offering me 20EUR?
Hello, I have already written to one of your colleagues yesterday and have yet to receive a reply.
It's about my closet, which arrived yesterday (order number: #ALPHANUMERIC-ID#).
The right drawer doesn't fit in the cabinet.
I would like to contact you as soon as possible.
The cabinet is currently not in use.
To be absolutely clear.
RBTV has promised a lot.
And yes, I know that not everything can be held.
And I had a lot of fun with RBTV.
But it is simply the case that the politics of this broadcaster are now under all sorts of pressure.
Almost every format is sponsored (ok), but then still go on a big begging tour.
It was said that one was an "independent" internet broadcaster.
Arno said, "We don't want to be a running toilet."
What are you doing now?
An 0815 advert trying to bring its BilloMerch to the elite fan.
And then we have Marah's Do's and Don'ts.
They apply to everyone, except for Simon and Etienne.
They can of course continue to offend people.
A Krogmann who lacks empathy and is trying to make ash out of the exploded rented rooms.
How can one find this?
Terrible if you like it, I find it horrible.
I request a refund as the delivered wooden table was defective.
A breakdown in the delivery of #PRS_ORG# caused the crash.
As a comforter for tummy aches or simply for cuddling - my little heat-loving friend is versatile.
Cherry pits are a traditional home remedy for soothing applications, as cherries are able to absorb heat and release it slowly.
The removable inner cushion can be easily warmed in the microwave or in the oven.
The soft touch makes the application particularly pleasant, so that the little ones feel safe even if things don't always go well.
The cherry-stone pillowcase with a reference is only suitable for the following applications:
Before warming up the meat, check for unusual odors, stains or burn marks and dispose of them immediately if present.
Please remove the inner cushion from the packaging before heating it.
In the microwave at max. 300 watts for max. 2 minutes (microwave manufacturer's specifications!)
Immediately after heating, the heat is evenly distributed in the blanket by shaking!
Then, the inner cushion is placed back in the cover.
At first heating, there may be slight moisture formation on the surface, but this disappears with repeated applications.
Be sure to follow the specified heating instructions, as longer periods or higher energy levels can lead to damage (ignition and burn risk!).
Before heating the kiss in the microwave, check to see if the manufacturer's instructions allow for the heating of kernels in the microwave.
After the heated inner cushion was put back in place, please check the temperature of the cushion for babies (max. 43 °C) on your arm!
Do not use the pillow for acute and chronic inflammatory or feverish illnesses, circulatory complaints, fresh haemorrhages, bleeding and open wounds, and in people with reduced pain sensitivity.
Before using this product, please consult a doctor if you have existing skin, heart, vein, diabetes, or tumor conditions, or if you are pregnant.
If seams have opened and loose kernels have come out, dispose of the product and loose kernels immediately and out of reach of children.
If the product is used on babies under 1 year old, the temperature of the baby should be checked regularly during application to prevent overheating!
Any serious incidents involving the product should be reported to the manufacturer and the relevant authority in the country where the user is based.
The handle is detachable and can be washed at 30°C in the machine.
Please note the care symbols on the product!
Darmstadt second after Hinserie - Pauli wins in Düsseldorf
Darmstadt 98 can dream of returning to the Bundesliga.
Meanwhile, Hannover 96 are working their way out of the relegation zone.
Ingolstadt is also not doing well under the third coach.
Jubilation in Darmstadt after the late victory in the top game, joy in Hannover over the interim coach Christoph Dabrowski and frustration in Ingolstadt after the bad start under the new coach Rüdiger Rehm.
Is the battery dead?
Last night my laptop (ThinkPad E480 20KQ and about 3 years old) stopped charging from my power supply.
I bought this about 5 months ago, so it should still work.
I thought that a power supply alone would be enough for operation.
Uh-oh, the battery is dead and the laptop won't start despite the plugged-in power supply.
I then removed the battery, but nothing happens here either.
Maybe you have ideas?
A new battery has been ordered, but why can't I use my laptop online?
Is there anything else broken?
Thank you for your help!
I want the delivery of the #PRS_ORG# to be brought to my room.
How can I book it?
I'm interested in the #PRS_ORG# chair.
But we don't know how high the seat is....
Often on tour and still have a lot of equipment with you?
No problem with the Everyday V2 Backpack from Peak Design.
The 20-litre capacity can also accommodate larger photography equipment without any problems, which can be safely stored using the padded FlexFold dividers.
And what you need for everyday items is well organized and separated from the photo equipment thanks to the practical access points in the individually configurable interior.
The "update" of the Everyday Line to version 2 (V2) also presents the series in a new look.
The minimalist design has a bit of a reputation - with the Everyday Backpack series, Peak Design has developed some highly innovative solutions to protect the interior of the bag while still providing quick access to photography gear.
It works in two ways: first, conventionally, by opening the lid, which can be secured with the MagLatch closure system, a highly thought-out solution for effective protection that has already proven itself in Messenger Bags.
There is a metal locking hook on the closure flap with a matching anchor bar on the front of the rucksack.
Unlike most backpacks, Peak Design has considered different "fill levels" - there are four anchor bars, which are stably riveted, into which the closure hooks can be inserted.
If the rucksack is full, take the top bar, if it's lighter, take the lower one.
The flap and the hook are also magnetic.
This way, the rucksack can also be securely closed without the hook being caught.
The second option differentiates the Everyday Backpack from other photo backpacks: In addition to the flap closure, there is also a zipper opening on both sides of the backpack.
This eliminates the biggest drawback of traditional backpacks with an open top - you don't have to rummage through the contents!
This clever detail also makes the backpack more practical: If you don't just take your photography equipment, but also everyday items or travel luggage.
In the Everyday Backpack, you can customize the interior (more on that below) and store both items separately - and access them independently through the two side openings.
You can also pull the rucksack from the right side over your body to access the camera equipment in the right main compartment, while the everyday items stay safely in the left rucksack compartment and don't get in the way.
Comfortable, easy-to-adjust straps help.
And since the outer shell of the rucksack is also made from 100% recycled, waterproof nylon, the contents will remain dry even if you're heading to Scotland in the autumn.
Unfortunately, I was waiting in vain for the email from their support.
#NAME# has emailed me confirmation of the appointment
The shipping company has announced that it will contact the customer to arrange the return of the wrongly delivered table.
So far, I have not received any news.
I request immediate settlement.
I am now writing with the third support worker, none of whom went further than a promise that I would receive an email confirmation.
It is about the return of the wrongly delivered Custom #NAME#.
When can the cabinet be delivered again?
I don't think it's an option to keep him...
It works.
Many thanks for the help
Wishing you a good evening
Hello, my order number is #NUMBER#. When will the article be delivered?
The order and payment was made on 12.1.21.
I was delivered a completely different lamp than I ordered
Please call me
If you extend the voucher, then I will immediately place a larger order, but at least I have kept the damaged piece of furniture and not sent it back.
And that the past year went differently than expected I could not anticipate and was not able to resolve and clarify in time.
But the damage I as a customer cannot accept.
Rotinger brake discs are designed to meet the demands of the dynamic driver, who values reliability and safety when braking under difficult conditions.
Rotinger brake discs are cast and then mechanically worked (drilled and cut).
All tempered glass is produced in short series according to individual technical characteristics, which are specific to certain types of glass and patterns.
Based on the individual technical drawing, a special production program is created that is tailored to the balancing of the disk according to the properties of the original assembly.
The discs produced in this way ensure high comfort and braking effectiveness.
The additional openings increase the effectiveness of the cooling of the disc, while the cuts improve the cleaning of the brake discs and brake pads.
The aesthetic properties of our painted wheels underline the attractive and striking appearance of each car.
Coloma is the city where an unexpected event shaped the history of the West Coast.
In the winter of 1848, a man discovered shining rocks in the water at the southern fork of the American River.
Although he tried to keep his discovery secret, the news spread quickly and caused the so-called "California Gold Rush" of '49.
Thousands came from near and far and made Coloma one of the fastest growing and thriving cities in the state.
Areas were cordoned off, tents were pitched, and saloons and hotels sprang up almost overnight.
Everyone wanted to share in the wealth of the country.
For many it was: "Coloma or Bust" (Coloma or Bankruptcy)!
In this game, you are a pioneer seeking wealth and fame in the West.
You'll be looking for gold, recruiting workers, herding horses, and building companies.
You will also have the opportunity to explore the surrounding river valleys and adjacent areas.
You're not alone - the other pioneers seem to have the same idea!
You have to outdo your peers to avoid going bankrupt with the rest of them.
Coloma is a fast-paced strategy game with many paths to victory.
You choose your actions simultaneously, must manage your resources and build a tableau that works more and more for you (so-called "engine building").
The buildings on your tableau allow you to become more efficient, to get additional actions or to apply rules in your favor.
With these buildings and dynamic bridge pieces, you can develop your individual playing style by making fine adjustments.
Coloma played over a period of three years from 1848 (the year the gold was discovered in Coloma), 1849 (the year of the California Gold Rush), and 1850 (the year California became a state).
A year in Coloma consists of five rounds.
During each round, players secretly and simultaneously choose a location on the board where they can perform actions.
Their selection will then be revealed and they will place their pioneers in the appropriate locations.
If a location has the most pioneers, it gets a lock!
This deactivates one half of the site - reducing the possible actions there.
Players take turns performing actions such as gathering resources, moving wagons, setting up tents, exploring rivers, building bridges, opening shops, and positioning revolver heroes.
When all the actions are completed, the pioneers return.
The spinner rotates at the beginning of each round to a new location, changing the available actions.
This goes on until the bidder has moved five times, so that he has covered every location once and the year ends.
There is a shootout in which the players must defend Coloma from a gang of angry bandits.
If the players have recruited enough revolver-wielding heroes and are numerically superior to the bandits, they will receive rewards.
However, if they fail, they will receive lower rewards or end up in the cemetery.
The game ends after the third shootout, then the final score is determined.
The player with the most points wins!
For free shipping, I take up to 35 x 25 x 4.5 cm.
At all other times, I usually insure with DPD and track shipments (playing a game of cat and mouse, getting wrapped up in flyers and packing paper).
If you are a collector, I can send cartons in cartons for an extra 2 euros, which will not cause any pressure marks.
"Why children are not tyrants" documentary, ARD Mediathek
CW psychological violence, sexual abuse, power abuse
The ARD documentary has now appeared in my Twitter timeline, and I have watched it.
Dr. Michael Winterhoff, a child psychiatrist, is a popular guest on talk shows and gives lectures across Europe.
His book "Why Our Children are Tyrannical" (2008) sparked a fierce debate on parenting.
Former patients and guardians have now made serious accusations against him.
Please be careful, the film is hard to watch.
And I am very grateful that many people now think and act differently.
Never, never, never should parents and other authorities have power over the child.
Our goal must always be to give the child space for their development and to make the framework for the child as large as possible, given the situation.
Brrr, I'm still shivering.
Holetschek: Countries advise on the abolition of the test obligation for triple-vaccinated people
The health ministers of the Länder will decide at their next meeting on a nationwide abolition of the testing requirement for triple-vaccinated people.
"We need to get clarity as soon as possible as to whether and when the test requirement for those who have been vaccinated three times can be dispensed with," said Klaus Holetschek (CSU), chairman of the health ministers' conference, to Bild am Sonntag.
The loss of 2G plus for triple-vaccinated people is "not only medically sensible, but also provides an additional vaccination incentive," said Holetschek.
Federal Health Minister Karl Lauterbach (SPD) has promised to "present a proposal to the Health Ministers' Conference on Tuesday next week". - AFP
So I want to send the lamp back
How should I go about this?
Hello, I find the #PRS_ORG# chair very nice, but I can't see how high the seat is.
Can you help me further?
I can't shop anymore through my #PRS_ORG#.
Error: Oops, something went wrong.
Shop online through the #PRS_ORG# website on a computer.
I have updated my contact details.
What is the reason for this?
What you describe is referred to as *awareness*, which is sensory awareness under general anesthesia.
These occur with a frequency of about 1 in 1000.
It is most common to hear sounds/voices, less often to see pictures and the least common to feel pain.
For this topic, relevant is that caesarean sections are operations with a high rate of awareness, as one avoids a very deep anesthesia in order to protect the child until birth.
Previous episodes of awareness should be mentioned during the preoperative discussion.
Certain anesthetic procedures, such as total intravenous anesthesia (TIVA), are associated with a slightly increased risk.
**EDIT: Love you all, this comment of mine describes awareness correctly, however** u/Nitemarex **did not.
I misread her comment.
However, the chair is broken.
Unfortunately, the 20€ do not help us either.
These are statutory warranty claims.
The absolute minimum would be to take back the broken chair.
This is in addition to the legal obligation and is standard in the eCommerce area.
Please check again to see if they will at least take back the broken chair.
We then sell the second chair privately.
We also lose a lot of money.
I have already sent you an email that you have not responded to.
Again, the question.
The order and invoice state that the goods will be delivered to a room of my choice.
The courier is company #NAME#.
I just called there.
They told me they only deliver to the front door - due to #PRS_ORG#.
Is that so?
If so, I have to cancel the order, because I don't know anyone who can help me move the heavy furniture up to the first floor.
Will I not be called?
I had a question
Theater historian Günther Rühle died at the age of 97
He has made a name for himself as a theatre critic and as an artistic director.
Later he wrote a monumental theater history.
Günther Rühle died on Friday at the age of 97.
There is still the new book on the table, freshly printed: "An old man gets older."
The shattering diary of a slow goodbye to the world, kept by the theater historian and journalist Günther Rühle until April 2021.
And in the middle of reading, the news comes that the author has died.
The last sentence in the book reads: "I am here to prove my life's worth."
There are different types of pallets.
One of the most common are European pallets, standard wooden pallets that are mainly used as load carriers in the European region.
They are certified by the European Pallet Association EPAL
According to data from Statistik Austria, over ten million pallets were produced in Austria in 2020.
The production value was around 79 million euros.
How many pallets are imported into Austria annually is not collected
New York wins first MLS championship
New York City FC has won the first Major League Soccer title.
After a 1-1 draw in regular time against host Portland Timbers, the Eastern Conference team won the final in a penalty shootout 4-2.
In the Eastern Conference final, New York defeated Philadelphia Union, the team of German Kai Wagner.
Rouladen tips & tricks
I had many great tips last week for the perfect goulash.
That was at Christmas and it was unbelievably delicious and buttery!
So thanks again :)
Now I have tasted it and I want to cook a roulade for the first time on New Year's Eve.
Tomorrow I will set up a beef fund.
Do you have any other tips for me?
Note: I don't have an oven, just a big pot.
What's next?
What happened to the books or how do I get them back on my #PRS_ORG#?
My English is not as good as it used to be, but I'll get there
I'm asking for a refund of €#NUMBER#.
I was informed by email on 18.01. that the refund had been processed.
However, to this day, the money has not reached me.
Please check that.
Where there is still Christmas ham in the Lübeck area
For many people, goose or duck are part of Christmas like the Christmas tree and presents.
Have you already bought any poultry?
Now time is running out.
We will tell you where you can still get a Christmas roast in Lübeck.
The "drive" of a tube output stage contributes significantly to the heat and fatness of the guitar amplifier sound.
These features are perfectly implemented by the Valve Reactor circuit.
With the VOLUME, GAIN and MASTER VOLUME controls, you can set both the desired level and the distortion of your sounds.
In addition, the VT+ series amplifiers offer a unique POWER LEVEL control, which allows you to reduce the volume without changing the "gain" or distortion.
Further up, it was already clear that the POWER LEVEL regulator can even float a reserve of power when it gets really loud.
The POWER LEVEL regulator allows you to use the full potential of the VT+ series in any situation.
The headphone jack can also be used as a line output.
The signal here is processed with a box simulation, so that you get an "acoustic" sound impression even when using headphones or when recording directly.
An AUX port can be connected to a CD or MP3 player so that you can jam to your favorite songs.
A tuner function is also on board - you do not need a separate tuner.
If you add a VFS5 foot pedal, you can also call up the sounds easily by foot, switch the effect blocks on and off, and tap the tempo of the compatible effects.
This is actually essential for live use.
With its new power packages, VOX is taking another step into the future!
But others saw it differently.
Then there is the possibility to send the lamp back?
Because it's too low for you to eat at a table?
So I would like to send them back.
Can you help me further?
And the dresser?
Will we get another update on the exact delivery date in the next few weeks?
Hello, have they already sat on the #PRS_ORG# chairs?
If it doesn't work, I'd be happy with a refund or a voucher.
In any case, I will find a buyer for the furniture.
Only over 1,000 euros worth of goods that I don't need are then a little bit much.
I just received my delivery and would have liked to know if screws were included in the delivery.
I would like to mount the #PRS_ORG# Spiegel (door) on the designated hinge.
That's not a satisfactory answer and the wait was not worth it
Do you have a premium customer status?
Iran sees progress in nuclear talks
According to Iranian reports, progress is being made in negotiations to revive the international nuclear agreement.
"Both sides are on the verge of agreeing on the issues that should be on the agenda," said Iran's chief negotiator Ali Bagheri to the news agency Irna on Sunday.
This is a "positive and important development," because at first there was not even agreement on the topics to be discussed.
The agreement is meant to prevent Iran from building nuclear weapons.
On Thursday, Vienna talks to revive the agreement were resumed after a week-long break.
Iranian, German, British, Chinese, French and Russian negotiators are taking part in the talks.
A US delegation is also present in Vienna, but only indirectly involved in the negotiations.
Thuringia has overtaken Saxony - now a federal state with the highest corona incidence
Thuringia has replaced Saxony and currently has the highest incidence rate in the country.
As the only federal state, the value exceeds the mark of 1000.
Thuringia was the only federal state to exceed the 1000 mark in the Corona incidence on Sunday.
The Robert Koch Institute reported a seven-day value of 1025 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants.
In Saxony, which has always shown the highest incidence rate nationwide, this value was at 990.5 on Sunday.
On Friday and Saturday, the incidence in Thuringia was slightly lower, but was still above the value of 1000.
In Thuringia, 2242 new infections with the Sars-CoV-2 virus were reported within one day, and 16 additional deaths were reported in connection with the infection.
On Sunday, 200 people with Covid-19 were treated in intensive care units in hospitals.
On weekends, there can be delays in reporting.
In addition, the health authorities have been overwhelmed for weeks and are hardly able to keep up with the collection of new cases.
I understand that.
Since the delivery is only beginning in March, it may be possible until then.
I have to print it and stick it on the package and drop it off at the post office, right?
Here I don't have to do anything else?
I don't want to do that, so I'm writing to you.
I would like to take responsibility for the return shipping.
I consider the 8 euro return fee to be a disgrace.
It's time for change
###The German Bundestag has welcomed me, I am StratorDE in the plenary hall in the heart of Europe on a fantastic day!
What is the purpose of the post here?
If one looks at the activity of the past months of the Bundestag one can see that it is not existing.
We have come to a winter slump and have widened the summer gap for a few months.
#Where is the problem?
Yes, what was the reason?
For the most part, this is likely to be related to dissatisfaction, as some things have gone wrong and we are generally doing a bad job.
In the last few days, it has become increasingly clear that many people are still very much looking forward to the MBundestag.
What we need to change
Here, the community around the Bundestag is asked which one it wants to keep alive.
The impetus came from u/edizVEVO, who became aware of this project in the last few days and found a pile of rubble.
After some back and forth, several people from the community have found themselves interested in rebuilding the project.
However, I would also like to call on everyone to participate, only then can this project continue to exist in the future.
We have created a discussion platform in the form of a Discord server, where we can exchange ideas and work on concrete things.
You can join the server by clicking on this link.
Goals:
* How should the Bundestag function in the future?
* What existing orders must be changed/amended/removed?
* How should we present ourselves to the outside world in the future?
* How will new members be recruited?
* How can we create a fair election system?
I'm pretty sure I've forgotten something, but that's okay, we'll discuss it on Discord at the end.
If you have the time and desire, come to the Discord, work with us, and let's democratically decide the future.
I have ordered a lampshade for you that is still to be delivered.
Now I see that the article is too big/clumsy for my taste.
I have already ordered another suspension for you.
I put it together and noticed it when I took the soft foam.
Very sad about that.
I hope this is returned and I get a full refund.
This is also pretty sad, as #NAME# is much darker than expected.
I have one question: the day cover #PRS_ORG# is it available in oversize, i.e. 240/240 for example?
#PRS_ORG# must guarantee that the faulty cabinet will be picked up as soon as possible.
And I ask you to please do so.
I don't have a suitable packaging, but I will try to dismantle the shelf as far as possible for collection - they need to talk to #PRS_ORG# to find out how this can be done.
#PRS_ORG# can be reached at any time by phone to arrange a pickup time.
Is there an instruction manual for assembly?
How long would it have taken me to get them and decide whether to return them?
Why are you vegan?
Today I had a conversation with a colleague that I like.
She herself has been vegetarian for a while, and currently eats meat only very rarely.
I was a vegetarian for several years myself.
When asked if I have always wanted to be vegan and vegetarianism was a planned intermediate step, I answered honestly without hesitation.
And that I had long thought that I was supporting animal welfare as a vegetarian, but eventually reflected and understood that I was ultimately supporting animal cruelty.
That's why I decided to become vegan.
At that moment I had the impression that she was feeling ill-disposed, she then defended vegetarianism and said she knew where her meat came from and that as a vegetarian she reduced animal suffering.
Now I wonder if my answer to "plump" was correct?
How do they answer the question?
I feel like as a vegan I am quickly put in a corner and conflicts arise without me wanting to.
It welcomes a vegan-loving hippie (;
It is not an exception under § 312d BGB.
Your #PRS_ORG# does not exempt you from the legal requirements for distance selling.
I am not able to pick up my retoure on the assigned date, #PRS_ORG#.
Since I can't be there for the funeral, I can't change that either.
Could you please assign me an alternative pick up time?
From 01.02.#NUMBER# onwards, I will be back again.
Lahnsteiner rescue for water rescue ready: 45,000 euro subsidy from the state
Recently, the Rhineland-Palatinate Interior Minister Roger Lewentz presented a grant of 45,000 euros for the new rescue vehicle for the volunteer fire department in Lahnstein to the Oberbürgermeister Peter Labonte.
The total cost of the vehicle, which has been in use since November 2020, was 135,000 euros.
A good and important investment in security.
I am delighted that the state of Rhineland-Palatinate is supporting us here," says Lahnstein's mayor Peter Labonte.
The diving equipment is used by the Lahnstein diving team, one of seven units in Rhineland-Palatinate.
They perform tasks in water and ice rescue and technical assistance.
In Lahnstein, they are constantly counting on increasing numbers: The boom in the hotel shipping on the Rhine and Mosel, as well as the steadily increasing use of the Lahn as a leisure river, contribute to this.
I bought a book that I could only read 10% of and then the problems started.
I can't open the book.
However, I followed their recommendations and synchronized, removed and reloaded the app, but nothing has worked.
I am a bit frustrated because the whole thing has cost me a lot of time and I now hope for help.
Okay, then.
I would like to order 3 articles from the #PRS_ORG# collection in June.
Can I enter a date in the ordering process?
According to the ANSI/PLATO FL1 standard, the previously mentioned values were measured at 21°C±3°C, 50%-80% humidity and the embedded 275mAh LiPo battery.
The values can vary depending on the type of flashlight used, age and environment.
*: The duration of the stage Hell contains the duration of the stage with reduced brightness due to the overheating protection.
2) Merchants are responsible for customers.
Customers should contact the retailers or distributors from whom they purchased Fenix lights for warranty support with the Fenixlight Limited 'Guarantee Card' and either a sales receipt or an invoice.
Fenix will provide our authorized dealers with the technology and parts necessary for the maintenance of our lights.
1) 15-day free replacement: Fenix will replace a defective product within 15 days of purchase if problems occur during normal use, if a manufacturing defect is suspected.
We will replace it with the same model.
When the model was discontinued, customers received a product with a similar or improved model.
2) Free repair for 5 years: Fenix offers free repairs for 5 years from the purchase date if a problem occurs due to normal use.
Different warranty periods for different products:
Except for the products and accessories listed above, other products or free offers from Fenix are not covered by the product guarantee.
3) Limited lifetime guarantee: For lights that have exceeded the free repair guarantee period, we offer lifetime repairs, but charge for parts.
The vendor informs the customer of the cost of the part before the repair.
4) Warranty certificate: Customers demand customer service from Fenix dealers or retailers by presenting a completed Fenix warranty card, a sales receipt or a receipt.
The distributor should offer services to customers and Fenix will support those services.
5) The free warranty does not cover damages or failures caused by:
Any defects or damage caused by improper use, including but not limited to the use not in accordance with the warranty or the instructions in the product specification.
For example, the product specification describes that the sealed head cannot be disassembled, as this would damage the flashlight and make the warranty invalid.
Any defects or damages caused by other behaviors cannot be adequately controlled by Fenix.
6) To make a claim under the guarantee, please contact our guarantee department with the following information: Name, type / model of the guarantee object, serial number.
Thanks for taking the time to do this, I've also spent almost a decade in the civil service in a similar role, so we were both bodyguards in the executive, I won't go into further details!
The question of right and left is always presented in a very simplified way.
In general, however, one should say that the civil servant is more likely to come from the liberal to conservative spectrum and not from the revolutionary left, which should be clear to everyone.
It should be clear to everyone that these people, who are attracted to the right-wing ideology, will have difficulty dealing with the lived reality, since you now have many Germans with a migrant background, women, and also homosexuals (and I don't mean the exaggeratedly feminine gay stereotypes, but rather normal men and women who you wouldn't notice if they didn't tell you). I can rely on these people to save your life or set this up for you.
But these fringe groups are also represented, even though it sounds funny at first, my experience is that they are proud to be German and feel that they are being mistreated by overly-zealous left-wing policies, even though these policies are supposedly meant to help them. They just want to be treated normally.
Back to the right, of course, since the police and military are also a cross-section of society, one can also find the extreme right there, but they are allowed to openly express their opinion or even make state-threatening plans in the media, which is completely exaggerated and annoys me.
Of course, it is not uncommon for police officers and soldiers who have been deployed abroad to begin to stereotype and even say things that are controversial or politically incorrect.
It is also possible that like-minded people will meet who engage in lively discussions.
Nevertheless, I think this is well fought and also countered by political education and enlightenment!
Germany is so very international and that's a good thing in my opinion that we can't afford to have real racists and Nazis in our ranks!
Yes, I don't understand what the other basket is, I also ordered it on the German side.
Why should this come from England?
When I ordered, it wasn't sold out.
I already ordered in November.
However, it was confirmed to me in your confirmation of the order
It's still about my order, which is no longer available.
I've chatted with #NAME# before.
Alternatively, one could deliver the other #PRS_ORG# basket for #NUMBER# euros to Germany or is this basket available in Germany as well.
I always see you as a partner company.
But there are two deep grooves on the edge of the wooden part, which were filled with something yellow
And there is a small scratch on the mirror itself.
Is the child normal?
Hello, I have been dealing with a problem for a long time.
I am very disciplined and organized at work (I'm independent, with little free time), but I've been struggling to keep my house clean and tidy for as long as I can remember.
There are always phases where nothing happens, and then and now I get motivated and clean up and tidy up.
But it's actually never "that someone could just drop by spontaneously."
Unfortunately, my husband is not better either, it bothers me somewhere but mostly household simply loses against work and laziness.
The kitchen is cleaned most regularly because we like to cook.
Now to my question, have you managed to become more orderly with your children?
We haven't done one yet, but we're working on it and this question has been bothering me for a while.
Because for me, there is no incentive to visit, it just doesn't bother me so much as long as there is fresh clothing available and the kitchen is usable.
If you have a child, do you give them a bigger push or do you slack off?
I look forward to hearing from you.
Exclusive, new, and high-quality, anatomically shaped cut provides maximum comfort, a perfect fit, and allows unrestricted movement.
Pre-moulding with special, further shaping at the joints for improved mobility (arm and knee bends)
The Focea Comfort 4 was more than doubled the area covered by the Flex System 2 to further enhance comfort.
Smooth stretch panels at the joints reduce friction (shoulder, arm and knee bends)
High-quality pre-forms in the lower back and in the step ensure a snug, perfect fit.
The Elaskin 8.8 Stretch Panel in the lumbar region increases flexibility around the back zipper and improves comfort, especially when bending and donning and doffing equipment on the surface.
The Free Flex Zone, which is located around the shoulders and back, guarantees increased flexibility in arm and back movements.
Fireskin is a warm, water-repellent material with a special surface structure that offers a high degree of cold protection.
Placed on the breast, it brings warmth to a sensitive area of the body.
Seamless, thin (-2 mm) face seal increases comfort, sealing and durability (separate hat)
The adjustable zone around the neck improves the seal with a fine-tunable width adjustment by a flexible, gentle-on-the-skin hook-and-loop fastener that doesn't adhere to the lining or seams
Double-zippered arm and foot joints connect a removable inner sleeve with a soft, neoprene outer sleeve
45° bend at the end of the inner cuff for increased elasticity and load-bearing when pulling on.
Long zipper at the neck with an elastic reinforcement, for an anatomical cut with increased comfort without a hood
Langer G-Lock P Back Zipper (Overall without hood) with metal slider and integrated Water Dam System for improved sealing (Beuchat Patent)
Zippers on arms and legs
Reinforcements at both ends of the zippers to prevent ripping if too much force is applied.
Neoprene panels bonded together with external and internal overlaps
Edges of the outer straps reinforced for greater load-bearing capacity
The edges of the inner manchetts are cut out for increased flexibility
The original Beuchat system was designed to fix the computer in place, specifically for deeper dives (the system is compatible with all common armband computers)
Career in social work - as someone with an insecure personality disorder?
I did an apprenticeship in the field of software development and have been learning for about a year now.
Unfortunately, I am realising more and more that this job is not right for me, which is why I have been thinking about starting afresh and studying social work for a while now.
The problem: I have an insecure (or avoidant) personality disorder (IPD).
In essence, it means that I have no self-esteem and am therefore shy.
I have no problem talking to people on a professional level, but it is very hard for me to have casual conversations and I have been told that I come across as standoffish (which I think has improved).
Can I become a social worker?
I don't want to work as a street worker or in an open youth club, but rather in, for example, addiction counseling or family support.
But I don't know if the actual working day is really like I imagine it to be, and it's difficult to find anything about it on the internet.
The ÄVPS is already causing problems for me in my job (for me, emotionally), because it always makes me feel bad when there is a problem with my code ("just simple things messed up") and it is hard for me to ask more experienced colleagues for help ("I should already know how to do it"/"I have to deal with my dumb questions"/"he makes me feel like I'm not smart enough" etc.).
I will probably have problems in every job, but I wanted to mention it here.
But have you already got the sofa back?
There was also no confirmation for that.
I'm waiting for a pickup time
What do they mean by return please!
If you have downloaded a book from the #PRS_ORG#, you will receive a notification that the #PRS_ORG# has not authorized this book.
Are there problems?
I was chatting with #PRS_ORG# who asked if I had received a delivery confirmation for my dresser.
The protein (amino acids) taken in with the food is broken down in the bird's digestive tract into the individual amino acids and used to build up the bird's own proteins, which it needs for feather formation.
The feather formation in the nestling and the feather regrowth in the moulting bird are extremely complex processes and are highly demanding on the overall organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio should not be administered during breeding, as it can cause disruptions to the breeding cycle.
Following this regular NEKTON-Bio, the daily vitamin supply with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral supplement) should be resumed.
The protein (amino acids) taken in with the food is broken down in the bird's digestive tract into individual protein building blocks (amino acids), which it then uses to build its own body proteins, which it also needs for feather formation.
The feather formation in the nestling and the feather renewal in the moulting bird are extremely complex processes and are highly demanding on the overall organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio should not be administered during breeding, as it can cause disruptions to the breeding cycle.
Following this regular dose of NEKTON-Bio, the daily vitamin supply with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral supplement) should be resumed.
1 g NEKTON-Bio in 250 ml water or 100 g of soft food.
It is only necessary to prepare as much drinking water/soft food as the bird consumes daily and to change the water/food daily.
A scraped measuring spoon (lying down) corresponds to 1 g of NEKTON Bio.
At severe feather damage, a double or triple dose of NEKTON-Bio can be given until the onset of feather regrowth is visible.
After that, the normal dose is given until the feather growth is complete.
Storage: NEKTON Bio should be stored dry, without direct sunlight, between 15° and 25°C.
Please forgive me, but the chair is being sold as an office chair.
How can a chair break down after 9 months?
The warranty claims in Germany are 24 months.
That's really bad service.
Hello, I sent an email on Monday to let you know that my order was damaged and pictures were added.
Did you receive this email?
A statement by a community worker in opposition to the ordinance
Hello r/LegaladviceGerman,
I have a problem.
A walnut tree will be felled on our property.
Therefore, a petition was submitted to the municipality.
A staff member wrote to me that the felling of fruit trees and the harvesting of walnuts are not part of the bylaws.
However, the walnut is explicitly listed as a protected tree in the statutes.
Can I now rely on the statement of the employee or not?
On the one hand, I can rely on expert opinion.
On the other hand, the statute is clear.
Thank you for your answers
We understand that.
Then we will use the new packaging for that.
I did not receive any message
Well, then I still have a sofo without use.
Could you offer me a bequest or a voucher?
What was more expensive?
Yes, I think that's true, only the question is whether I can pay in euros and have the roof delivered to Germany
Can you check that?
Urgent report: Serious traffic accident in Selb
Recently, a serious traffic accident occurred on the St 2179 between the exit of Selb-Nord and Plößberg.
According to the police press alarm (14:03), a car has come into the oncoming lane during overtaking.
There are injured people.
Okay, I understand.
Well, then, thank you again for making it so easy!
Advice and ideas for further professional life
Merry Christmas to you!
My Christmas is unfortunately not very good, because my dear head is thinking about everything that can be thought of.
Before I go here now ... in short: I need advice and the best advice from people who somehow know my situation - that is, you.
I'm just starting out as a referee.
Originally I studied something else and worked in that area (to at least remain somewhat anonymous, I will not be more specific here).
But then it was too boring for me and I looked for alternatives that would be more fun.
At some point I landed in the teaching profession and was sure that was it - even though the conditions were much less flexible than in my previous job, but that didn't matter to me.
I'm now at the third "I'm looking for other job postings" stage.
And it's only been half a year.
Before I started painting, I always decided to keep going and at least finish the race, afterwards I can still change my mind.
But I am absolutely done.
I had so little free time last month that I was completely exhausted.
Now, though, it's holiday time, but there's still a lot of work waiting for me.
Before the exam I always thought I was stress-resistant, but my weekend was also my weekend and my holiday was also my holiday.
That was my freedom.
And the stress at work was in the moments.
Now, my own family celebration is too much stress for me.
And then there are these rigid structures that further annoy me.
In general, it's fun and from the outside, it's running well, which is the feedback and so on.
But I'm completely exhausted and wonder how much stress my body can take before it shuts down - if it hasn't already.
I wonder if I want to keep working like this for the rest of my life - especially when I read some of your contributions - or if I should go back to the old area where I was appreciated, was given free time when I needed it, and found the work boring but was paid adequately and was part of a team that worked together and not as an individual fighter like it is now.
But then I wonder if I won't be back at the same place next year and be dissatisfied.
You notice that it's all a bit confusing, but maybe you have advice or ideas on how I can get out of this situation, which I am completely finished with and start crying at the slightest thought.
I'm not making decisions right now emotionally, which probably won't do anything good.
But maybe your views will help me to see at least a little bit of light at the end of the tunnel - or to be able to enjoy Christmas, which is enough for me for now.
Thanks for reading and forgive my whiny tone.
I hope my situation is at least a little clearer.
Since its introduction in 2001, the Valvetronix series from VOX has continued to evolve, which has led to the combination of advanced modeling technology with the "Valve Reactor" circuit, which perfectly emulates the behavior of a tube amplifier.
With the VT20X/VT40X/VT100X amps, we are introducing a brand new modeling engine that is completely up to date in terms of sound.
Thanks to the VET technology (Virtual Element Technology), which is based on the analysis of the components and circuit boards, the VTX amplifiers offer an authenticity that is absolutely impressive.
Of course, these amps also contain the multi-stage Valvetronix preamplifier.
This is partly based on actual analog circuitry, because these capture the sound variations and nuances of a tube amplifier better than any simulation.
In addition to this sophisticated circuit, the VTX amplifiers offer a closed case and a bass reflex system, from which the natural resonances only spurt.
With the VOX Tone Room software, you can even correct and bend historical facts on the virtual level, so that the amp and effects sound just like you always imagined.
The perfect combination of tube sound with modeling technology is primarily due to the 2001 introduced VOX Valve Reactor technology.
Of course, it has been refined multiple times since then to meet new sound requirements, which in 2010 once again led to a performance boost for the VOX Valvetronix series - with more dynamics as well as numerous and decisive improvements to the amplifier models.
The new VT+ Valvetronix series, with the hand-held VT20+ to the VT120+ with two speakers, was designed so that all guitarists looking for maximum sound variety will find it here.
All guitarists dream of the pressure and dynamics of a tube amp: they expect a fat sound, a nuanced rendition of playing dynamics and string attack, and a quick response.
During a detailed analysis, the VOX engineers discovered that the final stage determines the tube character of a preamplifier and developed the VOX Valve Reactor technology based on this discovery.
The Valve Reactor circuit of every VT+ amplifier is a perfect match for the subtle nuances and character of a tube amplifier.
NBA: Despite 20 points from Wagner, Magic lose to Clippers
The Orlando Magic's losing streak in the NBA continues.
The Wagner brothers can shine - but it's not enough to beat the Los Angeles Clippers.
Despite 20 points from Franz Wagner and seven points from his older brother Moritz, the Magic lost to the Los Angeles Clippers 104:106 on Saturday.
The main compartment is also adjustable: with three individually placable and foldable Velcro parts, it can be adjusted to the requirements of your photo equipment and is therefore suitable for all kinds of cameras - from mirrorless system cameras of all sizes to full-frame reflex cameras.
What actually fits in the backpack depends on the size of the camera and the lenses.
A possible kit would be a DSLR camera with a fixed lens, two or three interchangeable lenses, and a pop-up flash.
Larger DSLM cameras like the different models of the Sony a7 series or the Fuji X-T2 allow for further lenses.
In addition, one can store a lot of accessories.
And if you have a small DSLM camera (Olympus MFT cameras, Fujifilm X-A or E-series) you can use the backpack for your equipment and photography-related things.
Drone pilots will also find the Everyday Backpack 20L a good choice, as the backpack offers enough space for a DJI Mavic Pro with remote control and accessories.
Volcanic eruption on La Palma: longest in history
In the three months since the eruption began, the lava flows on the Canary Island have caused major damage.
Is an end in sight?
The eruption on La Palma, which has lasted for 85 days, is now the longest in the known history of the Spanish Canary Island.
The eruption of Tehuya volcano in 1585 lasted for 84 days, making it the longest on the Atlantic island off the west coast of Africa.
There are no reliable data on past eruptions.
The activity of the unnamed volcano on the Cumbre Vieja has decreased in recent days, but volcanologists are still hesitant to make any predictions as to when it might end.
The indicators point to a slowdown.
The best news is that they are stable," said the president of the island council, Mariano Hernández Zapata, to the state TV channel RTVE.
Damage in millions
Since the beginning of the eruption, more than 1,000 degrees of hot lava has destroyed more than 2,900 homes and other buildings, according to RTVE.
About 1,200 hectares were covered by a meter-thick lava flow.
That's almost 1700 football fields.
More than 7000 residents had to be evacuated, and the damage is estimated to be more than 900 million euros.
Two new landmasses, each about 50 hectares in size, were created by the cooling of lava along the coast.
The banana plantations, which are so important for the island, were particularly affected by the crisis, as about half of the approximately 85,000 inhabitants directly or indirectly depend on them, and the plantations were already in a crisis before the eruption.
225 hectares of banana plantations were destroyed, and further areas were heavily damaged, the newspaper El País reported.
Christmas and gifts
Christmas is knocking at the door and especially the children can hardly wait for the heavenly festival.
The many colorful gifts under the Christmas tree have combined with the spiritual atmosphere and the crackling tension to make it alluring.
Christmas is one of the few traditional occasions that our increasingly divided society can still come together around.
It is therefore all the more important to be aware of the Christmas tradition of giving, so that the act of giving, which according to the French sociologist and ethnologist Marcel Mauss was a peace-promoting "social contract of nature-peoples", can escape its rigid routine and be reinvigorated in the context of this tradition.
How Saint Nicholas became the Christ Child
Strictly speaking, it was the Protestants who linked Christmas with gift-giving.
Previously, gifts were exchanged on St. Nicholas Day in a variety of ways.
The background to this still popular custom is that Saint Nicholas, as Bishop of Myra, secretly threw gold into the windows of three women to save them from a life of sin.
From this unconventional way of giving arose the popular custom in Germany of filling children's shoes with gifts.
Protestants objected to this practice because they reject mediators between God and humans as "idolatry."
For this reason, they hide from the institution.
Martin Luther made the Nikolaus into the Christ Child and thus established a new tradition.
The focus of the gift-giving shifted to Christmas Eve.
However, since most Protestants no longer see such details so closely, it only angers a few that the tradition of Saint Nicholas, similar to the tradition of Saint Martin with its singing and procession, is still a firm part of the Christmas season.
Today, one can find everything from socks to coveted luxury watches in front of the door and under the Christmas tree.
Diversity of traditions in Christian countries
Sources attest to a tradition of giving on St. Nicholas' Day since the 13th century.
With the Reformation, the day of giving was moved to Christmas Eve.
However, in all Christian countries there is a merry-go-round of who brings the gifts to the children.
In Germany, it depends on the region whether the Christ Child appears on Christmas Eve or Father Christmas, who has acquired certain characteristics over time.
For example, his white beard, which has little in common with the rather strict Assyrian beard of the historical figure, his sledge, which is pulled by reindeer, and the preference for the fireplace to gain access to the houses.
In the Netherlands, Saint Nicholas remains the central figure at Christmas.
In Spain, the Three Kings give gifts, while in Italy, Befana is the witch who has shown them the way to the Christ child.
In Scandinavia, sometimes mythical creatures bring gifts, while in Russia, Father Frost brought some renown.
Here, it is not reindeer, but three horses pulling the sleigh.
In Czechia, the motherland of the Reformation during the Hussite Wars, the Christ Child is responsible for delivering the gifts.
I've been trying to download a new book for the past three weeks and keep getting this error message, but my account and contact details are up to date:
Please help me to fix the error, as I don't know how to do it.
Otherwise, you can buy another e-book #PRS_ORG#
I have been looking for a return label #NUMBER# for my order this past week and this morning.
I was told that I would receive one.
Since I haven't received any (not even in the SPAM folder), I was wondering how long it usually takes.
Many thanks.
Police shoot suspected bank robber near the Royal Palace
A man armed with a weapon was shot by police near Kensington Palace in London on Saturday.
Police said callers reported a man who went into a bank and a bookmaker's with a weapon.
The man fled in a vehicle, which was later stopped by officers.
Shots were fired and the man was hit.
He was declared dead at the scene.
The police did not assume a terrorist motive.
Several embassies are located in the area around Kensington Palace.
The palace is the official London residence of Prince William, his wife Catherine and their three children.
Other members of the royal family also live there.
What are they?
No matter where I click, I will be redirected to your page.
The decorative light fits harmoniously into every garden, garden area or stone garden.
The light fixture is simply placed and can be anchored into the ground with two ground spikes.
Integrated and powerful 0.4 Watt solar module for optimal charging of the built-in battery.
Maximum duration of 10 hours.
The robust plastic design is suitable for outdoor use all year round.
In the Hollywood spectacle, it is usually dangerous objects from distant galaxies that glow brightly within.
Smart Stone, on the other hand, is harmless: The sun alone is responsible for the fascinating illumination of this solar lamp – either in white or colored light (in six different color tones).
The smooth, amorphous design is deliberately chosen: Like a natural-formed large pebble, this modern light object presents itself to the public during the day.
Its organic curves fit into any natural environment - whether on the edge of a terrace, in the lawn or in the rock garden.
He also does well in the company of larger pebbles and stones, where he can defend himself thanks to his size.
You can save a lot of work: "Smart Stone" does not require an electrical connection or batteries.
Set the "beacon" at any sunny spot you choose.
Two provided poles provide stability as needed.
The matt white plastic shell itself is robust and weatherproof.
Its solar panel hides "Smart Stone" discreetly inside, together with its battery and two LEDs - one for white, the other for coloured light.
The battery is already charging when sunlight falls on the house.
When the sun sets, "Smart Stone" begins to glow on its own; you can choose the color yourself: there are six attractive light colors to choose from, in addition to daylight white.
The shutdown is also automatic, once the battery charge level drops to a preset minimum or it becomes bright again.
Once the sun comes out, the cycle starts again the next day.
I have done this several times and it doesn't work.
A shame, I would have liked to continue ordering from you, but if the voucher is not applied, then I will not order from you in principle.
If you have a different opinion, then let me know.
Otherwise, that was the last contact.
Then please send me the number for the sideboard.
In the lockdown, no garden centre was open....
The motor control of the LokSound 5 has been significantly improved.
A variable-frequency PWM frequency of 10kHz to 50kHz is just what is needed for quiet operation of a bell anchor motor – the typical "buzzing" sound is a thing of the past.
The load regulation can now also be adjusted to difficult cases with up to 10 CVs.
The unique "Autotune" function allows the decoder to be automatically matched to the motor.
The LokSound 5 decoder provides up to 1.5A motor current, enough to power older motors.
- Please use the Ebay shopping cart so that shipping costs are correctly calculated.
- You will receive an email with the tracking number.
- They receive a receipt with the VAT included from the specialist retailer for every new purchase.
- We usually process your order or request within 24 hours during working days.
Pill problem
Hello dear people of the world,
I hope I'm doing this right, it's my first post after a year on reddit.
My problem: I started taking the pill about five years ago, mainly because I was suffering unbearably during my period and awful PMS before my period.
Now I would like to stay like this because I already have to take too many medications that I cannot choose myself due to chronic illnesses.
My main problem, surprisingly not the pain, but my skin.
I got a two-year break from 0 to 100 explosions and these everywhere.
As far as I can tell, it was superficial, but it really bothered me and I didn't feel well.
In the two years of pause, it never really normalized.
Maybe someone has some tips to avoid this in the future.
My cosmetics are already fragrance-free and without any gimmicks, but maybe someone can recommend something to me.
The female doctor didn't take me seriously and the dermatologist's appointment is still pending.
Many thanks to everyone who has read the book!
Yes, the love of skin is a wonderful thing.
If you have severe neurodermatitis, then a period of rest, then large-scale lichen planus and the acne issue.
I have also tried various diets as a result of my Christian faith, and have remained on a sugar, milk and meat-free diet, as nothing else has worked properly.
It could also be that it's just a worm, but if I want to be everywhere, I'd rather not look for anything else that's wrong.
I had already given her colleague a seminar paper.
I wrote and now I've lost the conversation and I don't know what was replied to my request.
I have to work in between and on the phone, and suddenly everything was gone...
What is there to check if the money was there, I would have seen it
Please check my bank details, maybe there was something wrong
But it is generally available in large quantities.
because it is available in black and large.
The Zappiti 4K HDR Series - The Best Movie Experience Ever!
Zappiti designs and manufactures high-end video management systems for best picture quality, outstanding performance and maximum user-friendliness.
All Zappiti products are designed to give you a convenient and intuitive way to access your entire film library in stunning 4K High Definition resolution.
The award-winning Zappiti Player is successfully used all over the world to enhance the movie experience, both at home and in commercial settings.
The Zappiti Neo supports most digital audio and video formats, including the latest 4K HDR standards such as Dolby Vision and HDR10+, all current video formats, full BD/UHD menus, HEVC video codec with a billion colors (10-bit color encoding), VP-9, 3D video standards with 3D subtitles, high-resolution audio files such as DSD, FLAC, ALAC and MQA, and a robust, solid chassis with two HDMI outputs, 4K 60p, Dolby Atmos and DTS: X for the ultimate home cinema experience.
The combination of Zappiti Magic Pixel V3 and VS10 video processing offers outstanding picture quality - far better than previous generations - with improved dynamics, more accurate color representation, higher contrast, solid de-interlacing and better upscaling (up to 4K resolution).
Even on a Full HD 1080p television or front projector, you'll be blown away by the picture quality of your display!
3D also offers a better depth of field and an impressive, immersive effect.
Some Android apps are not suitable for use with the remote.
In this case, use a connected computer mouse or an AirMouse (not included in the delivery).
Networked playback: Special network optimization that uses SMB protocol (including HEVC UHD files) over Gigabit Ethernet or 10/100 Ethernet guarantees better playback performance over the local network, regardless of the type of media.
Universal RC: Seamless integration in Smart Home installations using ready-to-use Control4 drivers, RTI drivers, Elan drivers, Crestron IP codes, Savant, ProControl, Logitech, URC, Pronto and general IP codes.
It doesn't help much as I have been waiting for it since September.
Now nothing is going on.
My account appears to be locked and the language is English
Also compatible with all printers listed above, according to the manufacturer or user manual.
Over 10 years of experience as a specialist in toner production
All listed company and brand names, as well as all mentioned type designations, are the property of the respective legitimate manufacturers and owners.
Their mention is merely for orientation and knowledge of the compatibility of the goods.
It is not original products of the respective printer manufacturers, but compatible goods.
What vouchers?
I didn't get my voucher for the last order!
In the name of the people: lay judges pass sentences
They sit in the courtroom in everyday clothes on the judge's bench.
But their verdict depends on a lot, even if they don't wear robes: Judges decide whether and for how long someone goes to jail.
Two of them report in conversation with the "Public" about their time at the Bad Kreuznach Land Court: Sascha Wickert from Boos and Ruth Ertz from Bad Kreuznach are two of the 125 lay judges at the Land Court on the John F. Kennedy Street.
Hello, unfortunately I can't get into the customer account.
Could you please send me the invoice for order #NUMBER# to the above-mentioned email address once again?
Can we dispose of the packaging material?
We don't have the means to preserve them for so long.
We would use the table as if it were theirs, as if it were ours.
He had already ordered the same chair in blue in November and received it. Therefore, because they are so beautiful, he now has one in grey.
Does the cabinet need to be completely dismantled for pickup and return?
and when would the collection be?
110-kV underground cables will be built in 2022
The approval for the relocation of the new high-voltage cable in Tann is valid.
The government of the state of Niederbayern has given the go-ahead for construction to begin in 2022.
Now the network operator Bayernwerk has announced this.
The seven-kilometre-long earth cable will connect the Tann substation in the north of the municipality and the existing 110-kilovolt line between Simbach and Pfarrkirchen.
The cable will be connected to a mast near the village of Edermanning in Reut.
Good morning
My order from 03.01.21 with order number #NUMBER# has only arrived in parts so far.
The blue Betsell number #PRS_ORG# with the campaign number #NUMBER# was returned by #PRS_ORG# with the note "Delivery not possible".
All three packages have arrived, so delivery is definitely possible.
Can you tell me what happens next?
Have a great start to the week!
You can forget that, I have already explained this several times yesterday!
It's a glass cabinet and all the sides are smashed, so there's glass everywhere and the box is broken
The chest of drawers is in my apartment and #PRS_ORG# refuses to come into the apartment because of the #PRS_ORG# rules
This means that the chest of drawers cannot be taken away because no one is allowed to enter my apartment
Thanks for the message
But why only 20 euros?
The original price of this chair was #NUMBER# EUR
No, it's the same for all books, so yes, the request to #PRS_ORG# since it seems to be a general problem
Ref: Planning lessons (EK)
Hello dear colleagues and colleagues,
I have been teaching at the RE for the summer, and teaching has been fun, but I currently have a lot of trouble planning my Earth Science lessons efficiently.
Unfortunately, my school is not well equipped technically, so I can only use the blackboard, the school book and an overhead projector as a medium.
At school I can only copy s/w for free (which is annoying for geography).
I currently need to plan my hours for a very long time.
For example, we are currently dealing with geo-factors, and in my case, every hour is different.
Basically, the methods are the same, but on the other hand, I don't want to invest too much time in simple lessons (I need that time for UBs etc.).
I usually start planning from the learning goal (what do I want to achieve) and then think about how I can build on that (I usually create a worksheet with texts from books that my school doesn't have).
We have the book Terra and with most of the tasks in the book I am rather dissatisfied.
That is why the worksheets are also there.
Maybe a geography teacher can tell me how to work efficiently with the book.
I would really enjoy that.
I would like to return the #PRS_ORG# from the order #NUMBER#
I have actually already decided to join #PRS_ORG# but I would like to wrap up the reunion as soon as possible.
The trade is worried about the 2G rule during the Christmas season.
Only those who have been vaccinated or recovered are allowed to enter most stores.
The trade considers it unnecessary and complains of theft.
He also has a possible solution ready.
The 2G regulations are damaging the important Christmas business for the retail trade, according to the German Retail Association (HDE).
The HDE's chief executive, Stefan Genth, criticised the shortages of non-daily items.
According to a recent survey by the HDE, more than 70 percent of the companies surveyed were negative about the remaining days of the year.
Many had already written their Christmas shopping list.
"What should have been the high point of the year is now often a hole without a bottom," said Genth.
Retailers with 2G access restrictions lost around one-third of their pre-crisis sales last week.
It runs well in the retail trade and online.
The association demanded consequences from the dramatic development.
The purchase with mask, distance and hygiene concept is a safe affair, said the managing director.
"Shopping with 2G does not help us in the fight against the pandemic," he stressed.
The current regulations scared customers away and required high staffing levels.
He called for the ban on smoking in public places to be made nationwide.
After that, each customer would only need to be checked once on 2G (vaccinated or recovered) and would have access to all shops with the band they received that day.
In the retail sector - as is already the case in public transport with the 3G rule (vaccinated, recovered or tested) - spot checks should suffice.
The real estate company specializing in shopping malls, Deutsche Euroshop, also spoke of a difficult Christmas business.
The frequencies were last at around 75 percent of the pre-Corona level, the turnover at around 90 percent.
These figures will now fall in the middle of the important Christmas shopping season," said CEO Wilhelm Wellner of the "Wirtschaftswoche".
Due to the high personnel and administrative effort, solutions are being sought and approved for the centers.
This includes the so-called bracelet solution, where "visitors, for example, can present their 2G proof at a central point in the center and then, equipped with a wristband similar to that found in a club hotel, can freely enter all shops". dpa
I recently ordered and received the #PRS_ORG#
The Spiegel has a scratch and the frame is also a mistake, which was attempted to be covered up with a yellow filler.
That looks bad.
I would like to return the mirror and have already put it back in the package and taped it up.
How should I proceed with the return now?
The lamp is designed for dual-balance, based on new, flat SMD LEDs with high power and high color rendering.
For the setting of the color temperature and brightness of the lamp, a modern microprocessor with extraordinary capabilities is responsible.
In addition to adjusting the brightness, there are two standard color temperatures: daylight and artificial light.
It is also possible to manually set and save the color temperature in the range of 3100 - 5650K.
Use the current settings in the flash memory.
A special feature of the controller is that it is simple and intuitive to use.
The light bulb produces a very bright light with soft, high-quality light that is completely flicker-free.
The beam angle of 120 degrees, with which you can illuminate large areas at a relatively small distance, is excellent.
By the way, also in reporter situations in small rooms or short distances.
They can practically adjust the brightness without changing the color temperature.
It's a great tool to work on set or in the studio.
The optional DMX512 controller allows remote control of the light in television studios or when the light is mounted in hard-to-reach places.
The back of the light has the control panel, consisting of buttons and a light-up display.
The display shows the current brightness setting in percent and the current color temperature in Kelvin.
There is also a slot for the NP-F battery (not included in the delivery)
The user storage has up to three panel settings for brightness and color temperature.
To set the individual settings on the storage locations, simply press a storage button for a longer period of time and it's done.
The storage controller stores the current state of the lamp when it is turned off, so that when it is turned back on the known situation is restored - very useful in the studio when, for example, the camera is set to a particular colour temperature.
Working with batteries is one of the greatest strengths of the DL3120 functionality, thanks to the ability to operate with inexpensive NP-F batteries.
These are often already owned by photographers and cameramen (and women) - so you can draw on existing equipment.
The DL3120 can also check if the batteries have enough power - it has a built-in battery tester - for each of the two battery compartments, with a value in the two displays (the left battery upper display, the right one on the lower display).
In addition, it is of course possible to continuously supply the headlights with power via the supplied power supply.
The construction of the reflector is very simple.
They have a 16mm sleeve to secure it, so you can connect it directly to your tripod.
The inclination can be reliably set by measuring both sides.
It was also taken into account that the mechanical components are of the highest quality and are therefore designed for longevity and hard use.
In addition, a hinge is included in the delivery.
It also comes with a bag in the delivery.
This way you can transport and store the light and its accessories without any problems.
Sorry, I got it as a gift and it's too small :(
"Party we wanted to throw": Frankfurt celebrates after comeback against Leverkusen
What a spectacular reaction from Eintracht Frankfurt.
After 22 minutes, the last-placed Hessen, who had lost twice in a row, appeared to be on their way to another Bundesliga defeat.
But then the SGE turned around, got rid of their frustration from a bad start to the season within an hour and won with a score of 5:2. "It's crazy what the boys have done today," said coach Oliver Glasner at DAZN and praised each individual player, saying "general praise for everyone who was involved".
At first, it looked like another dampener for the now ninth-placed Frankfurt team, still behind their expectations.
Patrik Schick had put Leverkusen in the lead with 2-0.
What then happened was also impressive to the SGE coach.
"How the players then came back and showed a fantastic performance," said Glasner.
I am absolutely delighted with the performance we have shown and of course with the result.
Also the defender Christopher Lenz, who has not been able to play since the fourth game day and has overcome his muscle injury, emphasized the morale of his team-mates.
"I think our mentality is incredible," the 27-year-old said, and was pleased with the result in particular for the spectators.
That was the party we wanted to throw today.
However, Glasner is now focusing on the upcoming tasks, but he is also in a good position regarding the personnel situation.
It's remarkable that we have all the players fit in December, that all the players are physically fit.
It's top-class work in our medical department, but the players are also highly professional.
Now they want to "move forward one step at a time and remain modest" and complete the tasks until the end of the year "at this level."
Next up is a trip to Borussia Mönchengladbach (18:30, Sky) on Wednesday.
I will get the mail that my package returns to you due to a mistake on my part.
I tried to call #PRS_ORG# and get them to transfer me, but there was no chance.
Can it be resent to me directly or do I have to wait until the money is refunded and then place the order again?
Unfortunately, I would have to say that I would not order it again because it has already taken too long.
Have you ever sat on the #PRS_ORG# chairs?
Handball women's dampers for quarter-final against Spain
Germany's women's handball team slumped after the humiliation against Denmark with their heads down and empty eyes from the court.
At the end of the World Cup main round, the DHB selection lost 16:32 (8:13) in front of 800 spectators in Granollers and must now face host Spain in the quarter-finals.
"We were too afraid and had too much respect for the opponent," said national coach Henk Groener.
We have to play differently against Spain.
After the first defeat in the tournament, Germany closed the main round group III with 8:2 points as second place behind the Danes (10:0).
It's a shame we couldn't take the flow with us.
That was a bad game we have to get rid of," captain Emily Bölk said.
In the fight to reach the semifinals, a significant improvement is needed against the 2019 World Cup runner-up on Tuesday to keep alive the dream of the first medal since 2007.
The best German thrower in the duel with the three-time Olympic champion Denmark was back-rower Alina Grijseels with six goals.
"We weren't there - neither in attack nor defence," midfield player Xenia Smits admitted and urged: "We need to look ahead quickly."
Not level from front to back
Unlike in the previous five matches, the German team was not at its best at the start of the game.
Errors and technical errors in the attack and gaps in the defence were responsible for a quick 0:4 deficit after seven minutes.
Only goalkeeper Dinah Eckerle was immediately back to full strength and prevented further damage with some of her parades.
The first goal came after 9:30 minutes, when Grijseels successfully completed a quick counterattack.
However, the hoped-for ignition was not this one.
The German women were unable to counter the aggressive coverage of the Danes - and when they did, they usually failed to keep up with the strong Althea Reinhardt at the net of the Scandinavian players.
The game was already 3:10 after 20 minutes, as midfielder Mia Zschocke saw red shortly afterwards due to a hard foul on her opponent.
However, she can participate again in the quarter-finals.
It was only in the final phase of the first half that the DHB selection started to play better and at least reached five goals until the break.
The only faint hope for a comeback after the change was seven minutes in at 9:19.
The Green-Schützlings sinned in all areas and made it easy for the well-prepared opponent, who is a medal contender at the end of the tournament, to do so.
As a result, the German team could no longer rise to a performance improvement and left the parkett as a clear loser.
DACH Advent Calendar Day 6: Familientraditionen im Weihnachtszeit
As part of the Reddit Advent Calendar, we have celebrated Christmas Day and used it as an opportunity to celebrate family traditions during the Christmas season, including Christmas, Christmas Eve, and Christmas Day.
How was it at home back then?
Like your\*r partner\*in?
Do you want to pass on your traditions to your children?
What is best for the children?
The shoe cleaning?
Cookies?
Decorations?
Are you playing music?
Is the Christmas man, the Christ child or is the gift from Oma and Opa?
No matter how they do it, everyone gives it their all and puts in extra effort around Christmas to make it as nice as possible as a family.
Is it now a firm tradition, or even every year something different? Tell us how it went in your family!
Please send me any transaction number or anything else that might help
Confirmation... etc
I would like to give a voucher code
as is the case with #PRS_ORG# gift vouchers
What's going on with them?
The title is given to me, I work as a mobile vaccinator in mobile vaccination teams, where (so far) only the BioNTech/Pfizer vaccine is administered in nursing homes.
Since this is going to be completed soon, it will then go to vaccination centres for me.
I am happy to answer questions without time limits on the organizational and human aspects, as well as medical questions, as long as they are not personal (e.g. "I take medication X, will the vaccine interact with that?").
In my area, I am responsible for informing people about the vaccination, the indication (person has the right to be vaccinated according to the Corona Vaccination Ordinance and no reasons against it), the medical documentation and, if necessary, emergency care in case of allergic reactions (never happened to me).
The vaccination itself can be delegated to qualified personnel, such as medical assistants.
However, we often do not have any assistants for vaccine preparation, but "only" (for God's sake, no lack of appreciation!) pharmaceutical technicians for vaccine preparation, who cannot perform vaccinations (can't), so I do most of the vaccinations myself.
Heavy "Huidler" question: Amberger knows the solution
What is a "Huidlerer"?
With this dialect word, sent from Amberg, the BR television show "Wir in Bayern" has caused a lot of heated debate.
However, unlike on many previous days, the term "Host mi?" was not recognized by the callers this time.
No, it was not "a man who was nervous."
And no one, "who has to do everything quickly".
That was what the people heard from the TV presenter, it was completely wrong.
The man from Amberg informed about the solution and thus probably also caused astonishment among many Upper Palatines.
"The Huidlerer" the audience learned, "is a piece of cloth that someone uses to clean the oven."
Antony Rowley, a dialect expert from Bayerischer Fernsehen, has been interviewed by the Bavarian television station for years as an expert. He confirmed this.
With the note that this is a typical Upper Palatinate term, derived in some way from the more familiar dialect word "Houdern".
With which a learning gap was closed - also for many who have already been living in Amberg for a long time.
I haven't been able to buy any books for the past two weeks.
After confirmation, there always follows the following error message: oops - something went wrong - try again later.
I have restarted the #PRS_ORG#, connected it to the PC, synchronized and repaired it.
Nothing has helped.
Tyre choice for a racing bike - really so puncture-proof?
Today, this morning, I woke up full of the desire to train, because I wanted to train at least a little bit before my bike tour next week.
Said, done and I rode my racing bike, which I bought yesterday on eBay.
The first 40 km were also really nice - but then happened what lurks in every city (this time: thank you Krefeld!).
Glass splinters on the track.
Zack, loud screeching and my rear wheel wanted nothing more to do with the rest of the journey.
Since I didn't have the option of getting a replacement jacket and wetsuit, I had to turn around and take the first train home with a less-than-satisfactory attitude.
It was also not as bad as it could have been, maybe it is better if I practice changing the tire before the bike tour.
But now I stand before a question and hope that you can help me.
Since I have a relatively long distance to cover over several days, I would really hate to get this problem often.
It was not really bad, since the old tires from the previous owner (a very nice old man who had ridden them for many years) were already worn out and he had already described them as suboptimal.
But if I think about having to change a tyre at 80-90 km, then I really feel bad :D
Now I'm talking to an older man at the station who asks me why I don't have the Marathon Plus tyres; they're supposed to be unbreakable.
Now, the whole thing sounds very tempting.
But are they really so breakable?
I don't have the desire to spend 40€ on a tyre, only to be disappointed in the end.
I also wonder: I think I'm pedalling my bike 25x622 right now.
They do exist (apparently?) on the Marathon Plus tyres, but the majority are already wider.
Is this a problem?
Or would you recommend me to other tires in general for a racing bike?
The Schwalbe page seems to recommend the Durano DD to me.
Thank you in advance for the help and best wishes!
Car hits tree: driver killed
The 53-year-old was driving his car on the B57 between Rheinberg and Xanten when it crashed into a central island for unknown reasons and then veered onto the opposite carriageway, the police said.
There was a head-on collision with the vehicle of a 27-year-old.
The 53-year-old's car was then driven into a tree and the man was trapped inside.
The 27-year-old and his 23-year-old co-driver were seriously injured in the accident and taken to nearby hospitals.
Yes, we have all deleted all books, authorized new books and loaded new books.
Environmentally friendly: The products of MOTIP DUPLI are free of harmful metals.
The group is aiming to use recipes without regulated or questionable ingredients without affecting the best possible performance.
The caps and packaging are made from recyclable materials.
Disposal: Please only empty containers for recycling.
Bring garbage bags with leftovers to the problem disposal site.
Marking: All products of MOTIP DUPLI comply with the latest regulatory requirements.
The classification, labelling and designation are according to GHS/CLP 1272/2008/EG in the current form.
The safety data sheets comply with REACH 1907/2006/EG, Article 31 and Annex II, in the current version.
Many DUPLI-COLOR spray lacquers are equipped with spray protection and tamper-proof closure caps to prevent unauthorized use.
Pay attention to the relevant warnings on the cap or label.
Before applying, always read and follow the instructions carefully!
Will I get confirmation by email for this?
I have already received this 3 times from your colleagues...how reliable is your information?
When will the freight forwarder contact me?
I have already written, have you not received my sms?
After the release of our new High End Monoblock B 100- 6 OHM, it was only a matter of time before our SOLO series would get some new blood.
SOLO 15 is the new Sprössling and is reminiscent of the great predecessors with the B 200 - 6 OHM.
However, a suitably designed foot is included to raise the speaker to the correct listening position.
This has no effect on acoustics and can therefore be adjusted accordingly to suit the circumstances at home.
The SOLO 15 is very well suited to people who are not bothered by the maximum volume, but who want to achieve an exceptionally high sound quality.
A 10 cm speaker is simply not capable of producing such a large sound pressure level without distortion.
However, this does not mean that the SOLO 15 sounds weak.
In contrast, she is impressively mature and impressive for its size.
TONAL was tuned to a slight up-tone.
This is common practice for wideband signals to optimize the increasing concentration of high frequencies.
The SOLO 15 is precisely tuned to the sound stage and impresses with very clear and fine sound.
The high tones can be reduced externally and so the sound image can be made warmer.
Thanks to the point source, the location of individual components of a musical piece is measured accurately and precisely in the optimal stereo triangle.
The reference-susceptible extremally low mechanical losses of the B 100 - 6 OHM generate an enemy dynamics that is similar to its own.
The SOLO 15 adds to our SOLO series, but also expands its resolution and accuracy.
As with all our construction projects, it is advisable to think about the final appearance of the speaker at the beginning, so that appropriate changes to the construction can be planned.
For example, if one wants to furnish the case, the speaker must be adjusted accordingly, as the veneer adds additional material.
After all the plates have been cut (e.g. in the hardware store), one should first drill an 8 mm hole in the floor plate at the corresponding location to be able to run the cable through it later.
With the help of a router, the speaker opening in the front is now followed, so that the B 100 - 6 OHM can be fitted flush later.
The opening should be provided with a 45° chamfer to maximize the opening area of the speaker chassis on the inside.
The four connection points of the B 100 - 6 OHM receive a phase interruption, as shown in the image "Detail Phase".
Then one begins with the actual construction of the box and places one of the two side walls on a flat surface in front of oneself.
Now the back, the lid, the front and the floor will be glued.
The three reinforcements should also be installed and glued.
The reinforcements themselves can vary in thickness depending on the need, for example, if one wants to use ready-made panels from the hardware store instead of making them from 16 mm MDF.
In the next step, the second page is attached.
Then follow all the feet's plates, i.e. the two sides and the front.
With the help of a suitable hole saw or Forstner bit, the installation of the openings of the bass reflex port, as well as the connection clamp on the back wall, is facilitated.
Afterwards, a round router is used to round off all the edges of the actual box.
The top of the footboard can also be rounded off.
The floor plate is then fixed to the bottom of the case with glue and additional long wood screws.
Next, the fixing points of the speaker chassis and the connector are marked and drilled (2.5 mm drill bit).
After the housing has been cleaned of wood dust (vacuum / blow) one begins laying the cable.
The easiest way to achieve this is through the 35 mm bass reflex port in the back wall.
The entire and uncut cable is pushed through the 8 mm borehole in the foot piece by piece until the terminal opening and then left to hang out about 30 cm.
In the upper part of the housing, the cable is led to the speaker opening and left to hang loosely there.
The frequency selector is prepared and put into operation.
The construction plan for the frequency switch, as well as the corresponding connection plan, can be found in the following document: Installation instructions for the frequency switch Solo 15.
When the frequency switch is installed and the connection terminal is tightened, the sealing of the 8 mm cable opening inside the box is completed, which is still not completely closed.
With a bit of skill, you can drip hot glue into the 35 mm bASSREFLEX opening to seal it.
By opening the B 100 - 6 OHM and with a small lamp, one can check the seal accordingly.
Now follows the treatment, according to the description.
Then the B 100 - 6 OHM is connected and fixed with the corresponding screws.
The polarity is important here, so that the positive lead (marked cable) must be connected to the positive pole of the speaker (larger contact).
At the end, the bass reflex pipe is shortened to the given length of 28 mm (total length of the pipe) and inserted.
To combat the noise, a mat of the damping material is cut into two parts and loosely distributed in the housing.
The opening for the bass reflex channel should be kept clear.
Can I cancel the order now and have it delivered only in early June?
> Hello everyone
> Finally, we can announce that we will once again hold the OSCAST this year!
Unfortunately, it is not possible for us to get more than four people into the studio due to higher planning costs and the short notice of the announcement, which explains the short-term nature of the announcement.
BUT: There will be at least three people involved, so that we can watch the Oscars 2021 with at least 7 beans in the stream and hopefully thousands of you!
We do our best to avoid delays or other problems.
But hey, it's still a pandemic - nonetheless, we'll do our best to make the Oscars as entertaining as possible.
It will start around 0:30.
Set up some cold drinks, plan good food, and get ready for a long, but very interesting night.
